CIK: 898437
Company Name: ANIKA THERAPEUTICS INC 
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2020-03-06
Accession Number: 0001171843-20-001536


ITEM 1 BUSINESS Overview Founded in 1992, Anika Therapeutics, Inc. is a global, integrated joint preservation and regenerative therapies company based in Bedford, Massachusetts. Our mission is to be the global leader in orthopedic joint therapies and sports medicine with innovative technologies that exceed our customers expectations. We are committed to delivering solutions to improve the lives of patients across a continuum of care from joint pain management and regenerative therapies to sports medicine and orthopedic joint preservation and restoration. We have nearly thirty years of global expertise commercializing more than twenty products based on our hyaluronic acid, or HA, technology platform, and we are focused on adding innovative and differentiated offerings to our consolidated portfolio. Our proprietary technologies for modifying the HA molecule allow product properties to be tailored specifically to multiple therapeutic uses. Certain of our technology chemically modifies HA to allow for longer residence time in the body. We have 2 forms of cross linked HA gel technologies, and a solid form of HA technology HYAFF which is the platform for our regenerative medicine. These proprietary technologies are protected by an extensive portfolio of owned and licensed patents. As we look towards the future, our business is uniquely positi1d to capture value within the sports and regenerative medicine market. Our success is driven by our focus on our talent and culture, investment in innovative research and development programs to feed our product pipeline, expanding our commercial footprint domestically and internationally, and pursuing strategic inorganic growth opportunities. We intend to continue to accelerate our commercial capabilities as we transform into a customer centric company dedicated to advancing the joint preservation and restoration continuum of care. We believe that this commitment, along with our financial resources and operating history, have positi1d us well to deliver sustained value to our shareholders. In early 2020, we expanded our overall technology platform through our strategic acquisitions of Parcus Medical, LLC, or Parcus Medical, a sports medicine implant and instrumentation solutions provider focused on surgical repair and reconstruction of ligaments and tendons, and Arthrosurface, Incorporated, or Arthrosurface, a joint preservation technology company specializing in less invasive, b1 preserving partial and total joint replacement solutions. The Company expects the Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface acquisitions to drive growth by Broadening Anika's product portfolio further into the sports medicine joint preservation and restoration space; Adding high growth revenue streams; Expanding our commercial capabilities; Diversifying our revenue base; and Expanding our product pipeline and research and development expertise. In addition, we believe that our historical HA and regenerative medicine expertise will be highly complementary to the sports medicine implants and instrumentation expertise of Parcus Medical and the partial and total joint replacement expertise of Arthrosurface. We believe that the combination of these 3 businesses positions Anika to provide innovative solutions along the orthopedic continuum of care and build significant value for patients, physicians, and key healthcare system stakeholders. 5 Industry Historically, our outward looking industry focus has been on viscosupplement and regenerative orthopedic products that utilize HA as their major comp1nt. These products are used in a range of treatments, from providing pain relief from osteoarthritis to regenerating damaged tissue such as cartilage. Osteoarthritis is a debilitating disease that causes pain, swelling, and restricted movement in joints. Treating the pain associated with osteoarthritis with viscosupplement products has been our predominant focus and our main source of historic revenue over the past five years. In addition to the treatment of osteoarthritis, our HA based portfolio has products targeted to orthopedic regenerative medicine, advanced wound care, products used to prevent post surgical adhesions after a variety of surgical procedures, as well as ophthalmic products and veterinary products targeted to treat equine osteoarthritis. With the recent additions of the Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical businesses, we have effectively broadened our industry focus and increased our addressable market. Arthrosurface focuses on less invasive, b1 preserving partial and total joint replacement implants and instruments that may be utilized by physicians when more conservative solutions have been exhausted, but before the need for invasive total joint replacement procedures is necessary. Parcus Medical has a full portfolio of implants, materials and instrumentation used for soft tissue fixation in sports medicine procedures designed with surgeon input to ensure usability for our physician customers. With this expansion along a broader continuum of care ranging from joint pain management, a market opportunity we estimate to be approximately $10 billion, to sports and regenerative medicine and less invasive implants, a market opportunity we estimate to be approximately $7.0 billion, we are positioning the company for future growth, especially within the sports medicine industry. We intend to leverage our technology portfolios and our burgeoning commercial infrastructure to provide sustained revenue growth and become a leader in the areas in which we do business. Products Joint Pain Management Therapies Our Joint Pain Management Therapies product family consists of injectable viscosupplement products that provide pain relief from osteoarthritis conditions. These products include MONOVISC, ORTHOVISC, CINGAL, and HYVISC, HA based intraarticular injectable products indicated for the treatment of osteoarthritis pain. Our Joint Pain Management Therapy products are administered to patients in an office setting. We distribute the products in this category using a distributor model, as more fully described in the section titled Sales Channel. In the United States, MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC are marketed by DePuy Synthes Mitek Sports Medicine, a division of DePuy Orthopaedics, Inc., or Mitek, under the terms of a pair of licensing, distribution, supply, and marketing agreements, or the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement. In the United States, MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC have maintained the combined overall viscosupplement market leadership position since the first quarter of 2018 on a revenue generation basis. Internationally, we market our Joint Pain Management Therapy products using a growing ne2rk of commercial distributors in Canada, Europe, the Middle East, Latin America, and Asia. HYVISC is a high molecular weight injectable HA product for the treatment of joint dysfunction in horses due to non infectious synovitis associated with equine osteoarthritis. HYVISC is distributed by Boehringer Ingelheim Vetmedica, Inc., or Boehringer, in the United States. Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care Our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care family consists of the following key products Several orthopedic regenerative medicine products based on our proprietary HYAFF technology, which is a solid form of HA. They include HYALOFAST, a biodegradable support for human b1 marrow mesenchymal stem cells used for cartilage regeneration and as an adjunct for microfracture surgery. These products are currently available in Europe, South America, Asia, and certain other international markets. TACTOSET, an HA enhanced b1 repair therapy designed to treat insufficiency fractures. TACTOSET is available in the United States, and we expect to leverage the commercial infrastructure of our recent acquisitions to increase market access to sell TACTOSET. 6 Arthrosurface catalogue of over 150 partial and total joint surface implants and preservation solutions for the knee, shoulder, hip, ankle, wrist and toe that are designed to treat upper and lower extremity orthopedic conditions caused by trauma, injury and arthritic disease. These products are designed to be less invasive and more b1 preserving than conventional joint replacements. These products are available in the United States and over 25 international markets. Parcus Medical line of surgical implant and instrumentation solutions that are used by surgeons to repair and reconstruct damaged ligaments and tendons due to sports injuries, trauma and disease. These solutions include screws, sutures, anchors, and other surgical systems that facilitate surgical procedures on the shoulder, knee, hip, distal extremities, and tissue. They are typically utilized by surgeons in ambulatory surgical center, or ASC, and hospital environments. These products are commercialized in the United States and over 60 international markets. Other Our Other product family consists of legacy HA based products that do not fit into 1 of our other primary product categories. These products include Advanced wound care products based on our HYAFF technology are used for the treatment of skin wounds, ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers. The products cover a variety of wound treatment solutions, including debridement agents, advanced therapies to aid healing, and scaffolds used as skin substitutes. Leading products include HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL, which are used for the treatment of complex wounds such as burns and ulcers. Products used in connection with the treatment of ENT (ears, nose and throat) disorders. The lead product is MEROGEL, a HYAFF based woven fleece nasal packing. We have partnered with Medtronic XoMed, Inc., or Medtronic, for worldwide distribution of these ENT products. Ophthalmic products, including injectable, high molecular weight HA products used as viscoelastic agents in ophthalmic surgical procedures such as cataract extraction and intraocular lens implantation. Sales Channels Since our inception in 1992, we historically utilized a commercial partnership model for the distribution of our products to end users. Our strong, worldwide ne2rk of distributors has historically provided, and continues to provide, a solid foundation for our revenue growth and territorial expansion. In 2019, we implemented a hybrid commercial approach that balances a small direct model with a ne2rk of distributor partners in the U.S. market, and we utilized this hybrid approach for the launch of TACTOSET. The acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical each added to our commercial infrastructure, especially in the United States. Arthrosurface has approximately 35 sales representatives and 100 distributors in the U.S., while Parcus Medical employs a similar, though more mature, model as Anika and has over 50 U.S. distributors in place. For products in our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care family, including those currently in research and development or those not yet developed, we intend to leverage the expanded hybrid direct sales infrastructure of the consolidated entity. This framework pairs an internal direct sales team with external sales agent partners to maximize territorial coverage and sales generation. Generally, products within this family are sold into surgical environments, such as hospitals or ambulatory surgery centers, and we believe that we have a strong infrastructure now in place to service these customers. We intend to cross train the sales staffs to create a consolidated sales structure selling all of the products within our portfolio. We also intend to assess each selling territory to maximize our coverage and reach as many customers and patients as possible. For longer term future products in the U.S. market within our Joint Pain Management Therapies or Other families, we intend to evaluate our commercial model and possible alternatives or augmentations in each instance on a case by case basis, based on market dynamics and other factors. These models could include direct sales, distribution partnerships, or a hybrid of those forms. For current products in the U.S. market, we intend to retain our current distribution relationships, including with Mitek, as they continue to provide meaningful revenue and growth opportunities. 7 Internationally, we expect to maintain our current distribution model for the foreseeable future. Notwithstanding that general expectation, we will evaluate modifications or possible alternatives to that model on a case by case basis based upon market dynamics and resource allocation. We also intend to evaluate and synergize our international distributor base to ensure that we maximize our partnerships and grow revenue from our entire product portfolio. Manufacturing We manufacture the majority of our products ourselves at our facilities in Bedford, Massachusetts, where we make the totality of the products associated with the historic Anika business, and, following our acquisition of Parcus Medical, in Sarasota, Florida, where we make the vast majority of the historic Parcus Medical finished products. For the manufacture of the partial and total joint surface implants and preservation products produced for Arthrosurface, we engage a single third party organization as a contract manufacturer. The raw materials necessary to manufacture our products are generally available from multiple sources. However, we rely on a small number of suppliers for certain key raw materials and a small number of suppliers for certain other materials required for the manufacturing and delivery of these products. Research and Development Our research and development efforts primarily consist of the development of new medical applications for our technology platform, the development of intellectual property with respect to our technology platform, the management of clinical trials for certain product candidates, the preparation and processing of applications for regulatory approvals, and process development and scale up manufacturing activities for new and existing products. Our development is focused on orthopedic and regenerative medicine, including products for tissue protection, repair, and regeneration. For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, research and development expenses were $16.7 million, $18.2 million, and $18.8 million respectively. The decrease in 2019 was mainly due to timing and decision making regarding our clinical activities. We anticipate that we will continue to commit significant resources to, and increase our aggregate spending on, research and development efforts including new product development, preclinical activities and clinical trials in the future. Current research and development activities include clinical trials for CINGAL, a joint pain management therapy composed of our proprietary cross linked HA material combined with an approved steroid, and HYALOFAST, an innovative product for cartilage tissue repair, meant to support eventual regulatory approval for these products in the United States. In pursuing a U.S. regulatory pathway for CINGAL, we have conducted 2 Phase III clinical trials and 2 follow up studies, and the United States Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, has indicated an additional Phase III trial is necessary to support U.S. approval. We are currently working to initiate a pilot study to confirm our trial design, increase our probability of success in a Phase III trial and generate data that ultimately will be needed to support FDA approval. We remain on track to commence the CINGAL pilot study in the first half of 2020. We are also conducting a Phase III trial to support the U.S. regulatory approval of HYALOFAST. We expect to complete patient enrollment in the HYALOFAST study by the end of 2020. In addition, we are working to expand our regenerative medicine pipeline with a new product candidate in the form of an implant for rotator cuff repair utilizing our proprietary solid HA technology, which could be employed to repair partial and full thickness rotator cuff tears. We finalized an initial product prototype, and we are currently performing preclinical testing on the product and developing the surgical instrumentation for the potential product. Intellectual Property We seek patent and trademark protection for our key technology, products and product improvements, both in the U.S. and in select foreign countries. When determined appropriate, we enforce and plan to enforce and defend our patent and trademark rights. While we rely on our patent and trademark estate to provide us with competitive advantages as it relates to our existing and future product lines, it is not our sole source of protection. We also rely upon trade secrets and continuing technological innovations to develop and maintain our competitive position. In an effort to protect our trade secrets, we have a policy of requiring our employees, consultants and advisors to execute proprietary information and invention assignment agreements upon commencement of employment or consulting relationships with us. These agreements also provide that all confidential information developed or made known to the individual during the course of their relationship with us must be kept confidential, except in specified circumstances. 8 Governmental Regulation The clinical development, manufacturing, and marketing of our products are subject to governmental regulation in the United States, the European Union, and other territories worldwide. Various statutes, regulations and interpretations thereof, directives, and guidelines, including the Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act in the United States, govern the development, design, non clinical and clinical research, testing, manufacture, safety, efficacy, labeling, packaging, storage, record keeping, premarket clearance or approval, adverse event reporting, advertising, and promotion of our products. Product development and approval within these various regulatory frameworks takes a number of years and involves the expenditure of substantial resources. Pharmaceutical and medical device manufacturers are also inspected regularly by the FDA and other applicable regulatory bodies. Medical products regulated by the FDA are generally classified as drugs, biologics, or medical devices, and the current classification standards for our current or future may be altered over time. Drugs and biologic products undergo rigorous preclinical testing prior to beginning clinical trials. Clinical trials for new drugs or biologic products include Phase I trials in healthy volunteers to understand safety, dosage tolerance, and pharmacokinetics, Phase II trials in a limited patient population to identify initial efficacy and side effects, and Phase III pivotal trials to statistically evaluate the safety and efficacy of the product. Medical devices intended for human use are classified into 3 categories (Class I, II or III) on the basis of the controls deemed reasonably necessary by the FDA to assure their safety and effectiveness. Class II devices are cleared for marketing under the premarket notification 510(k) regulatory pathway, which may include clinical testing. Class III devices require pre market approval based on valid scientific evidence of safety and effectiveness, including evidence elicited through appropriate clinical testing. The failure to adequately demonstrate the quality, safety, and efficacy of a product under development can delay or prevent regulatory approval of the product. In order to gain marketing approval, we must submit to the relevant regulatory authority for review information on the quality aspects of the product as well as the non clinical and clinical data. The FDA undertakes this review in the United States. In the European Union, medical devices must be CE Marked in order to be marketed. CE marking a device involves working with a Notified Body, and in some cases a Competent Authority, to demonstrate that the device meets all applicable requirements of the Medical Devices Directive and that our Quality Management System is compliant. Drug approval in the European Union follows 1 of several possible processes (i) a centralized procedure involving members of the European Medicines Agency Committee for Medicinal Products for Human Use; (ii) a mutual recognition procedure in which an individual country's regulatory agency approves the product followed by mutual recognition of this approval by regulatory agencies of other countries; or (iii) a decentralized procedure in which the approval is sought through the regulatory agencies of multiple countries at the same time. Approval timelines can range from several months to several years, or applications can be denied entirely. Product or product comp1nt classifications as drugs, biologics, or medical devices may change over time due to new regulations or augmented interpretation of data or current regulations. The approval process can be affected by a number of factors. For example, additional studies or clinical trials may be requested during the review, which may delay marketing approval and involve unbudgeted costs. As a condition of approval, the regulatory agency may require post marketing surveillance to monitor for adverse effects, and may require other additional studies, as it deems appropriate. After approval for an initial indication, further clinical studies are generally necessary to gain approval for any additional indications. The terms of any approval, including labeling content, may be more restrictive than expected and could affect the marketability of a product. The FDA has broad regulatory compliance and enforcement powers. If the FDA determines that we failed to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, it can take a variety of compliance or enforcement actions, including, without limitation, issuing an FDA Form 483 notice of inspectional observations or a warning letter, imposing civil m1y penalties, suspending or delaying issuance of approvals, requiring product recall, imposing a total or partial shutdown of production, withdrawal of approvals or clearances already granted, pursuing product seizures, consent decrees or other injunctive relief, or criminal prosecution through the Department of Justice. The FDA can also require us to repair, replace, or refund the cost of products that we manufactured or distributed. Outside the United States, regulatory agencies may exert a range of similar powers. We are subject to various U.S. federal and state laws pertaining to healthcare fraud and abuse, including anti kickback and false claims laws. Similar review and regulation of advertising and marketing practices exists in the other geographic areas where we operate. 9 We are also subject to various laws and regulations concerning data privacy in the United States, Europe, and elsewhere, including the European Union of the General Data Protection Regulation ( GDPR ). These regulations impose several requirements on the processing, administration, security, and confidentiality of personal data. These regulations empower enforcement agencies to impose large penalties for noncompliance. Environmental Laws We believe that we are in compliance with all foreign, federal, state, and local environmental regulations with respect to our manufacturing facilities. The cost of ongoing compliance with such regulations does not have a material effect on our operations. Competition We compete with many companies including large pharmaceutical firms and specialized medical device companies across all of our product lines. For our Joint Pain Management Therapies products, our principal competitors are Sanofi Genzyme, Zimmer Biomet, Inc., Bioventus LLC, and Ferring Pharmaceuticals. Following our acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical, our key competitors for our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care products include Arthrex, Inc., Smith & Nephew P.l.c., Integra LifeSciences, Inc., Stryker Corporation, Wright Medical Group N.V., Zimmer Biomet, Inc., and CONMED Corporation. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial resources, larger research and development staffs, more extensive marketing and manufacturing organizations, and more experience in the regulatory processes than we have. We also compete with academic institutions, government agencies, and other research organizations, which may be involved in the research and development and commercialization of products. Many of our competitors also compete against us in securing relationships with collaborators for their research and development and commercialization programs. We compete with other market participants primarily on the efficacy of our products, our products reputation for safety, and the breadth of our sports and regenerative medicine product portfolio. Other factors that impact competition in our industry are the timing and scope of regulatory approvals, the availability of raw material and finished product supply, marketing and sales capability, reimbursement coverage, product pricing, and patent protection. Some of the principal factors that may affect our ability to compete in the sports and regenerative medicine development and commercialization markets include The quality and breadth of our continued development of our product portfolio; Our ability to complete successful clinical studies and obtain FDA marketing and foreign regulatory approvals prior to our competitors; Our ability to build our commercial infrastructure, integrate our sales channels and execute our sales strategies; The execution by our key partners of their commercial strategies for our products and our ability to manage our relationships with those key partners; Our ability to recruit and retain skilled employees; and The availability of capital resources to fund strategic activities related to the significant expansion of our business or product portfolio, including through acquisitions of third parties or certain assets. 10 We are aware of a number of companies that are developing and or marketing competitive products. In some cases, competitors have already obtained product approvals, submitted applications for approval, or commenced human clinical studies, either in the United States or in certain foreign countries. All products face substantial competition. There exist major worldwide competing products for use in joint pain management, orthopedic joint preservation and restoration, surgical adhesion prevention, advanced wound care, ENT, cosmetic dermatology, ophthalmic surgery, and the treatment of equine osteoarthritis. There is a risk that we will be unable to compete effectively against our current or future competitors. Additionally, legislation and regulation aimed at curbing rising healthcare costs has resulted in a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. In turn, this has led to greater and more intense competition in the provision of products and services to market participants. Important market makers, like group purchasing organizations and integrated delivery ne2rks, have increased their negotiating leverage, and if these market makers demand significant price concessions or if we are excluded as a supplier by these market makers, our product revenue could be adversely impacted. Employees As of December 31, 2019, we had 154 employees, 128 of whom were located in the United States, 22 of whom were located in Italy, and 4 of whom were located in the United Kingdom. We consider our relations with our employees to be good. N1 of our U.S. employees are represented by labor unions, but certain employees based in Italy are represented by unions, adding complexity and additional risks to the wage and employment decision processes. Product Liability The testing, marketing, and sale of human health care products entails an inherent risk of allegations of product liability, and we cannot assure that substantial product liability claims will not be asserted against us. Although we have not received any material product liability claims to date and generally have coverage under our insurance policy of $5.0 million per occurrence and $5.0 million in the aggregate, we cannot assure that if material claims arise in the future, our insurance will be adequate to cover all situations. Moreover, we cannot assure that such insurance, or additional insurance, if required, will be available in the future or, if available, will be available on commercially reasonable terms. Any product liability claim, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Available Information We are required to file annual, quarterly and current reports, proxy statements and other information with the SEC. The SEC maintains a website at www.sec.gov that contains reports, proxy and information statements, and other information regarding issuers that file electronically with the SEC. Our Annual Reports on Form 10 K, Quarterly Reports on Form 10 Q, Current Reports on Form 8 K, proxy statements, and other information, including amendments and exhibits to such reports, filed or furnished pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 are available free of charge in the SEC Filings section of our website located at http www.anikatherapeutics.com, as soon as reasonably practicable after the reports are electronically filed with or furnished to the SEC. The information on our website is not part of this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 11 ITEM 1A. RISK FACTORS Our operating results and financial condition have varied in the past and could vary significantly in the future depending on a number of factors. You should consider carefully the risks and uncertainties described below, in addition to the other information contained in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, before deciding whether to purchase our common stock. If any of the following risks actually occurs, our business, financial condition, results of operations, and future prospects could be materially and adversely affected. In that event, the trading price of our common stock could decline, and you could lose part or all of your investment. Risks Related to Our Business and Competitive Position Our financial performance depends on the continued sales growth and increasing demand for our products and we may not be able to successfully manage the expansion of our operations. Our future success depends on substantial growth in product sales. There can be no assurance that such growth can be achieved or, if achieved, sustained. There can be no assurance that, even if substantial growth in product sales and the demand for our products is achieved, we will be able to Maintain and develop the necessary manufacturing capabilities; Develop, successfully implement and or integrate appropriate commercial models to generate increased sales or obtain the assistance of additional marketing partners; Attract, retain, and integrate required key personnel; and Implement the financial, accounting, and management systems needed to manage our overall business and growing demand for our products. Our failure to successfully manage future growth could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Substantial competition could materially affect our financial performance. We compete with many companies, including large pharmaceutical companies, specialized medical devices companies, and healthcare companies. Many of these companies have substantially greater financial resources, larger research and development staffs, more extensive intellectual technology portfolios, more extensive marketing and manufacturing organizations, and more experience in the regulatory process than us. We also compete with academic institutions, government agencies, and other research organizations that may be involved in research, development, and commercialization of products similar to our own. Because a number of companies are developing or have developed products for similar applications as our products and have received FDA approval, the successful commercialization of a particular product will depend in part upon our ability to complete clinical studies and or obtain FDA marketing and foreign regulatory approvals prior to our competitors, or, if regulatory approval is not obtained prior to our competitors, to identify markets for our products that may be sufficient to permit meaningful sales of our products. For example, we are aware of several companies that are developing and or marketing products similar to ours for a variety of human applications. In some cases, competitors have already obtained product approvals, submitted applications for approval, or have commenced human clinical studies, either in the United States or in certain foreign countries. For example, certain products made by our competitors for the treatment of osteoarthritis in the knee received FDA approval before ours and have been marketed in the United States since 1997, as well as select markets in Canada, Europe, and other countries. In addition, the market for our current or future products could be adversely impacted if disruptive technologies or modalities are developed by third parties. There can be no assurance that we will be able to compete against current or future competitors or that competition will not have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 12 A significant portion of our revenues are derived from a small number of customers, the loss of which could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition and results of operations. We have historically derived the majority of our revenues from a small number of customers who resell our products to end users, and most of these customers are significantly larger companies than us. For the year ended December 31, 2019, five customers accounted for 82% of product revenue, with Mitek al1 accounting for 71% of product revenue. We expect to continue to be dependent on a small number of large customers for the majority of our revenues in the near term future, though the significance will be diluted with the implementation of our hybrid commercial model and our recent acquisitions of Arthrosurface, which utilizes a hybrid model with a direct sales team in the United States, and Parcus Medical, which utilizes a similar model to us in the United States. The failure of key customers to purchase our products in the amounts they historically have or in amounts that we expect would seriously harm our business. In addition, if present and future customers terminate their purchasing arrangements with us, significantly reduce or delay their orders, or seek to renegotiate their agreements on terms less favorable to us, our business, financial condition, and results of operations will be adversely affected. If we accept terms less favorable than the terms of the current agreements, such renegotiations may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and or results of operations. Furthermore, in any future negotiations we may be subject to the perceived or actual leverage that these customers may have given their relative size and importance to us. Any termination, change, reduction, or delay in orders could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Accordingly, unless and until we diversify and expand our customer base, or develop alternative commercial strategies, our future success will significantly depend upon the timing and size of future purchases by our largest customers, and the financial and operational success of these customers. The loss of any 1 of our major customers or the delay of significant orders from such customers, even if only temporary, could reduce or delay our recognition of revenues, harm our reputation in the industry, and reduce our ability to accurately predict cash flow, and, as a consequence, it could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Our license agreements with Mitek provide substantial control of MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC in the U.S. to Mitek, and Mitek actions could have a material impact on our business, financial condition and results of operations. The Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement provide Mitek with, among other things, the exclusive right to market and sell MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC in the United States, unilateral decision making authority over the sale, price, and promotion of MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC, substantial control over the future development of MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC related to the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis, a license to manufacture and have manufactured such products in the event that we are unable to supply Mitek with MONOVISC or ORTHOVISC in accordance with the terms of the relevant agreement, and certain rights of first refusal with respect to future products we develop for the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis. In exchange, Mitek pays us a transfer price calculated with reference to historical end user prices in the market and a fixed royalty rate per product on their net product sales. As Mitek accounts for a large percentage of our yearly revenue and has unilateral decision making authority over in market activities, including end user pricing and discounts, reimbursement strategy, and overall promotion strategy, actions taken by Mitek could impact our ability to predict and generate revenue and have a material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We are dependent upon marketing and distribution partners and the failure to maintain strategic alliances on acceptable terms will have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Though we have implemented a hybrid commercial approach in the United States and added substantial commercial infrastructure through our acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical, our success will remain dependent, in part, upon the efforts of our marketing and distribution partners, including our sales agent partners in the U.S. under our hybrid commercial model, and the terms and conditions of our relationships with such partners. 1 partner, Mitek accounted for 71% of our product revenue in fiscal year 2019. We cannot assure you that our partners, including Mitek, will not seek to renegotiate their current agreements on terms less favorable to us or terminate such agreements. A failure to renew these partnerships on terms satisfactory to us, or at all, could result in a material adverse effect on our operating results. 13 We continue to seek to establish long term partnerships in regions and countries not covered by existing agreements, and we may need to obtain the assistance of additional marketing partners to bring new and existing products to market and to replace certain marketing partners. There can be no assurance that we will be able to identify or engage appropriate distribution or collaboration partners or effectively transition to any such new partnerships. The failure to establish strategic partnerships for the marketing and distribution of our products on acceptable terms and within our planned timeframes could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. As our international sales and operations grow, we could become increasingly subject to additional economic, political, and other risks that could harm our business. Since we manufacture our products for sale worldwide, our business is subject to risks associated with doing business internationally. During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, 21%, 19%, and 20%, respectively, of our product sales were to international distributors. We continue to be subject to a variety of risks, which could cause fluctuations in the results of our international and domestic operations. These risks include The impact of recessions and other economic conditions in economies, including Europe in particular, outside the United States; Instability of foreign economic, political, and labor conditions; Unfavorable labor regulations applicable to our European operations, such as severance and the unenforceability of non competition agreements in the European Union; The impact of strikes, work stoppages, work slowdowns, grievances, complaints, claims of unfair labor practices, or other collective bargaining disputes; Difficulties in complying with restrictions imposed by regulatory or market requirements, tariffs, or other trade barriers or by U.S. export laws; Imposition of government controls limiting the volume of international sales; Longer accounts receivable payment cycles; Potentially adverse tax consequences, including, if required or applicable, difficulties transferring funds generated in non U.S. jurisdictions to the United States in a tax efficient manner; Difficulties in protecting intellectual property, especially in international jurisdictions; Difficulties in managing international operations; and Burdens of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws. Our success depends, in part, on our ability to anticipate and address these and any new risks. We cannot guarantee that these or other factors will not adversely affect our business or operating results. Risks Related to Our Commercialization Activities We may not succeed in our commercialization efforts for TACTOSET and certain other products in the United States, and our failure to do so could negatively impact our business and financial results. 14 For near term opportunities in the U.S. market, especially for our Joint Preservation and Restoration Care products, we intend to utilize our hybrid commercial model and the commercial infrastructure of our recent acquisitions, Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical. This approach is a departure from our historical distribution model in the United States, and we cannot be certain that we will be successful in implementing and executing on this commercial approach or that, even if we are able to implement it, the approach will be successful at scale. The commercialization of TACTOSET, other current products, and any future products commercialized or launched under this model is subject to many risks, including that we have not previously commercialized a product on our own and cannot guarantee that we will be able to do so successfully or profitably. We may not be able to attract or retain the sophisticated personnel required for our approach, to identify or negotiate favorable or acceptable terms with distribution agents, to achieve in market pricing at the levels we have targeted, to timely execute on our strategies for market penetration generally, or to generate meaningful sales of TACTOSET or other products as a result of other market dynamics. Among other factors, our competitors often offer a broader range of products than we do, which could make their aggregate offerings more attractive to end users, distributor agents, group purchasing organizations, hospitals, and surgeons. Our failure to successfully implement and execute on this commercial approach could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We must achieve market acceptance of our products in order to be successful in the future. Our success will depend in part upon the acceptance of our existing and future products by the medical community, hospitals, physicians, other health care providers, third party payers, and end users. Such acceptance may depend upon the extent to which the medical community and end users perceive our products as safer, more effective, or more cost competitive than other similar products. Ultimately, for our new products to gain general market acceptance, it may also be necessary for us to develop marketing partners or viable commercial strategies for the distribution of our products. There can be no assurance that our new products will achieve significant market acceptance on a timely basis, or at all. Failure of some or all of our future products to achieve significant market acceptance could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Sales of our products are largely dependent upon third party reimbursement and our performance may be harmed by health care cost containment initiatives or decisions of individual third party payers. In the United States and other foreign markets, health care providers, such as hospitals and physicians, that purchase health care products, such as our products, generally rely on third party payers, including Medicare, Medicaid, and other health insurance and managed care plans, to reimburse all or part of the cost of the health care product. We have generally depended upon the distributors of our products to secure reimbursement and reimbursement approvals. Reimbursement by third party payers, both in the United States and internationally, may depend on a number of factors, including the individual payer determination that the use of our products is clinically useful and cost effective, medically necessary, and not experimental or investigational. Since reimbursement approval is required from each payer individually, seeking such approvals can be a time consuming and costly process which, in the future, could require us or our marketing partners to provide supporting scientific, clinical, and cost effectiveness data for the use of our products to each payer separately. Significant uncertainty exists as to the reimbursement status of newly approved health care products, and any failure or delay in obtaining reimbursement approvals can negatively impact sales of our new products. In addition, we cannot be certain that payers who currently provide reimbursement for our products will continue to provide such reimbursement in the future, and such payer decisions could negatively impact the sales of our current or future products. In addition, third party payers are increasingly attempting to contain the costs of health care products and services by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement for new therapeutic products and by refusing, in some cases, to provide coverage for uses of approved products for disease indications for which the FDA, or the applicable foreign regulatory agency, has granted marketing approval. Also, the U.S. Congress, certain state legislatures, and certain foreign governments and regulatory agencies have considered reforms, including, among other Item, the potential repeal of the Affordable Care Act in the United States, which may affect current reimbursement practices and create additional uncertainty about the pricing of our products, including the potential implementation of controls on health care spending through limitations on the growth of Medicare and Medicaid spending. There can be no assurance that third party reimbursement coverage will be available or adequate for any products or services developed by us. Outside the United States, the success of our products is also dependent in part upon the availability of reimbursement and health care payment systems. Domestic and international reimbursement laws and regulations may change from time to time. Lack of adequate coverage and reimbursement provided by governments and other third party payers for our products and services, including continuing coverage for MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC in the United States, and any change of classification by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services for ORTHOVISC and MONOVISC, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 15 Our business may be adversely affected if consolidation in the healthcare industry leads to demand for price concessions or if we are excluded from being a supplier by a group purchasing organization or similar entity. Because healthcare costs have risen significantly over the past decade, numerous initiatives and reforms have been launched by legislators, regulators, and third party payers to curb these costs. As a result, there has been a consolidation trend in the healthcare industry to create larger companies, including hospitals, with greater market power. As the healthcare industry consolidates, competition to provide products and services to industry participants has become and may continue to become more intense. This may result in greater pricing pressures and the exclusion of certain suppliers from important markets as group purchasing organizations, independent delivery ne2rks, and large single accounts continue to use their market power to consolidate purchasing decisions. If a group purchasing organization excludes us from being 1 of their suppliers, our net sales could be adversely impacted. We expect that market demand, government regulation, third party reimbursement policies, and societal pressures will continue to change the worldwide healthcare industry, which may exert further downward pressure on the prices of our products. We experience quarterly sales volume variation, which makes our future results difficult to predict and makes period to period comparisons potentially not meaningful. We experience quarterly fluctuations in our products sales as a result of multiple factors, many of which are outside of our control. These quarterly fluctuations create uncertainty as to the volume of sales that we may achieve in a given period. As a result, comparing our operating results on a period to period basis might not be meaningful. You should not rely on our past results as an indication of our future performance. Our operating results could be disproportionately affected by a reduction in revenue because a proportionately smaller amount of our expenses varies with our revenue. As a result, our quarterly operating results are difficult to predict, even in the near term. Risks Related to Our Product Development and Regulatory Compliance We are facing a longer than expected pathway to commercialize our CINGAL product in the United States, and we may face other unforeseen difficulties in achieving regulatory approval for CINGAL, which could affect our business and financial results. In the second quarter of 2018, we received and analyzed the results of our second Phase III clinical trial for CINGAL and found that, while substantial pain reduction associated with CINGAL was evident at each measurement point, the data did not meet the primary study endpoint of demonstrating a statistically significant difference in pain reduction between CINGAL and the approved steroid comp1nt of CINGAL at the six month time point. After completing the analysis of the data related to the totality of our studies for CINGAL and discussing the same with FDA, FDA indicated that an additional Phase III clinical trial would be necessary to support U.S. marketing approval for CINGAL. We decided during the second quarter of 2019 to conduct a pilot study to enable us to evaluate our full scale Phase III clinical trial design, including patient and site selection criteria, and increase the probability of success for the Phase III trial. We expect to begin enrolling patients in the pilot study in the first half of 2020, but we may experience significant delays in patient enrollment or the pilot study may otherwise not be successful. If the pilot study is successful, we expect to commence an additional Phase III trial, but we cannot guarantee the success of any additional Phase III trial. Because the results of the pilot study or any additional Phase III trial, or other unforeseen future developments, could have a substantial negative impact on the timeline for and the cost associated with a potential CINGAL regulatory approval, our overall business condition, financial results, and competitive position could be affected. Failure to obtain, or any delay in obtaining, FDA or other U.S. and foreign governmental approvals for our products may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. Several of our current products, and certain future products we may develop, will require clinical trials to determine their safety and efficacy for United States and international marketing approval by regulatory bodies, including the FDA. Product development and approval within the FDA framework takes a number of years and involves the expenditure of substantial resources. There can be no assurance that the FDA will accept submissions related to our new products or the expansion of the indications of our current products, and, even if submissions are accepted, there can be no guarantee that the FDA will grant approval for our new products, including CINGAL, HYALOFAST, or other line extensions of our current products, or for the expansion of indications of our current products on a timely basis, if at all. In addition to regulations enforced by the FDA, we are subject to other existing and future federal, state, local, and foreign regulations applicable to product approval, which may vary significantly across jurisdictions. Additional approval of existing products may be required when changes to such products may affect the safety and effectiveness, including for new indications for use, labeling changes, process or manufacturing changes, the use of a different facility to manufacture, process or package the device, and changes in performance or design specifications. Failure to obtain regulatory approvals of our products, including any changes to existing products, could have an adverse material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 16 Even if ultimately granted, FDA and international regulatory approvals may be subject to significant, unanticipated delays throughout the regulatory approval process. Internally, we make assumptions regarding product approval timelines, both in the United States and internationally, in our business planning, and any delay in approval could materially affect our competitive position in the relevant product market and our projections related to future business results. We cannot be certain that product approvals, both in the United States and internationally, will not include significant limitations on the product indications, and other claims sought for use, under which the products may be marketed. The relevant approval or clearance may also include other significant conditions of approval such as post market testing, tracking, or surveillance requirements. Any of these factors could significantly impact our competitive position in relation to such products and could have a negative impact on the sales of such products. Once obtained, we cannot guarantee that FDA or international product approvals will not be withdrawn or that relevant agencies will not require other corrective action, and any withdrawal or corrective action could materially affect our business and financial results. Once obtained, marketing approval can be withdrawn by the FDA or comparable foreign regulatory agencies for a number of reasons, including the failure to comply with ongoing regulatory requirements or the occurrence of unforeseen problems following initial approval. Regulatory authorities could also limit or prevent the manufacture or distribution of our products. Any regulatory limitations on the use of our products or any withdrawal or suspension of approval or rescission of approval by the FDA or a comparable foreign regulatory agency could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Our operations and products are subject to extensive regulation, compliance with which is costly and time consuming, and our failure to comply may result in substantial penalties, including recalls of our products. The FDA and foreign regulatory bodies impose extensive regulations applicable to our operations and products, including regulations governing product standards, packing requirements, labeling requirements, quality system and manufacturing requirements, import restrictions, tariff regulations, duties, and tax requirements. We cannot assure you that we will be able to achieve and maintain compliance required for FDA, CE marking, or other foreign regulatory approvals for any or all of our operations and products or that we will be able to produce our products in a timely and profitable manner while complying with applicable requirements. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements could result in substantial penalties, including warning letters, fines, injunctions, civil penalties, seizure of products, total or partial suspension of production, refusal to grant pre market clearance or pre market approval for devices or drugs, withdrawal of approvals, and criminal prosecution. Additionally, regulatory authorities have the power to require the recall of our products. It also might be necessary for us, in applicable circumstances, to initiate a voluntary recall per regulatory requirements of 1 or several of our products. The imposition of any of the foregoing penalties, whether voluntarily or involuntary, could have a material negative impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Any changes in FDA or international regulations related to product approval or approval renewal, including those currently under consideration by FDA or those that apply retroactively, could adversely affect our competitive position and materially affect our business and financial results. FDA and foreign regulations depend heavily on administrative interpretation, and we cannot assure you that future interpretations made by the FDA or other regulatory bodies, with possible retroactive effect, will not adversely affect us. Additionally, any changes, whether in interpretation or substance, in existing regulations or policies, or any future adoption of new regulations or policies by relevant regulatory bodies, could prevent or delay approval of our products. In the event our future, or current, products, including HA generally, are classified, or re classified, as human drugs, combination products, or biologics by the FDA or an applicable international regulatory body, the applicable review process related to such products is typically substantially longer and substantially more expensive than the review process to which they are currently subject as medical devices. In 2018, FDA publicly indicated its intent to consider HA products for certain indications for regulation as a drug and has indicated that industry should submit new products or indication expansions to the OCP to designate the appropriate FDA office for review. There exists uncertainty with respect to the final interpretation, implementation, and consequences of this development, and this or any other potential regulatory changes in approach or interpretation similar in substance to those menti1d in this paragraph and affecting our products could materially impact our competitive position, business, and financial results. 17 Additionally, the implementation of the new European Medical Device Regulation, or EU MDR, set to take full effect in 2020, is expected to change several aspects of the existing regulatory framework in Europe. Specifically, the EU MDR will require changes in the clinical evidence required for medical devices, post market clinical follow up evidence, annual reporting of safety information for Class III products, and bi annual reporting for Class II products, Unique Device Identification, or UDI, for all products, submission of core data elements to a European UDI database prior to placement of a device on the market, reclassification of medical devices, and multiple other labeling changes. Approvals for certain of our currently marketed products could be curtailed or withdrawn as a result of the implementation of the EU MDR, and acquiring approvals for new products could be more challenging and costly. For example, the CE Mark indication for MONOVISC of the treatment of pain associated with osteoarthritis in all synovial joints was limited to the knee joint by our notified body as a result of the EU MDR, pending our generation of adequate data to support the broader indication previously granted. We do not expect this limitation to have a material impact on MONOVISC revenue generation, but compliance with this and any other requirements could be time consuming and costly, and our failure to comply may subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. We may rely on third parties to support certain aspects of our clinical trials. If these third parties do not successfully carry out their contractual duties or meet expected deadlines, we may not be able to obtain regulatory approval or commercialize our products, and our business could be substantially harmed. We have hired experienced clinical development and regulatory staff, and we have also retained the services of knowledgeable external service providers, including consultants and clinical research organizations, to develop and supervise our clinical trials and regulatory processes. Despite our internal investment in staffing, we will remain dependent upon these third party contract research organizations to carry out portions of our clinical and preclinical research studies for the foreseeable future. As a result, we have had and will have less control over the conduct of the clinical trials, the timing and completion of the trials, the required reporting of adverse events, and the management of data developed through the trials than would be the case if we were relying entirely on our own staff. Outside parties may have staffing difficulties, may undergo changes in priorities or may become financially distressed, adversely affecting their willingness or ability to conduct our trials. Failure by these third parties to comply with regulatory requirements or to meet timing expectations may require us to repeat clinical or preclinical trials, which would delay the regulatory approval process, or require substantial unexpected expenditures. We are subject to various healthcare laws and regulations, and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liability and harm our business. Our business involves substantial interaction and collaboration with healthcare professionals, including physician consultants, clinical investigators, and actual and potential customers. These relationships are subject to federal and state healthcare laws, as well as equivalent foreign regulations. These statutes and regulations include, without limitation, false claims laws, anti kickback regulations, the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, and the Physician Payments Sunshine Act. Any failure to comply with these laws could subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 18 We are subject to environmental regulations and any failure to comply with applicable laws could subject us to significant liabilities and harm our business. We are subject to a variety of local, state, federal, and foreign government regulations relating to the storage, discharge, handling, emission, generation, manufacture, and disposal of toxic or other hazardous substances used in the manufacture of our products. Any failure by us to control the use, disposal, removal, or storage of hazardous chemicals or toxic substances could subject us to significant liabilities, which could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Risks Related to Our Business and Industry We may not generate the expected benefits of our recent acquisitions, and the integration of those acquisitions could disrupt our ongoing business, distract our management and increase our expenses. Through our recent acquisitions of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface, we expanded our product portfolio and pipeline, diversified our business, entered new markets, and increased the scope of our operations and the number of our employees. The continued successful integration of these other companies into our operations is critical to our future financial performance. This will require that we integrate more closely the companies product offerings and research and development capabilities, retain key employees, assimilate diverse corporate cultures, further integrate management information systems, consolidate the acquired operations and manage geographically dispersed operations, among other things, each of which could pose significant challenges. The difficulty of combining the acquired companies with our company may be increased by the need to integrate personnel, and changes effected in the combination may cause key employees to leave. To succeed in the market for joint preservation and restoration, we must also invest additional resources, primarily in the areas of sales and marketing, to extend name recognition and increase market share. It is possible that the integration process could take longer than anticipated and could result in the loss of valuable employees, additional and unforeseen expenses, the disruption of our ongoing business, processes and systems, or inconsistencies in standards, controls, procedures, practices, policies and compensation arrangements, any of which could adversely affect our ability to achieve the anticipated benefits of the acquisitions. There may be increased risk due to integrating financial reporting and internal control systems. The diversion of the attention of management created by the integration process, any disruptions or other difficulties encountered in the integration process, and unforeseen liabilities or unanticipated problems with the acquired businesses could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. There can be no assurance that these acquisitions will provide the benefits we expect or that we will be able to integrate and develop the operations of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface successfully. Any failure to do so could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. We may have difficulty managing our growth. Through our recent acquisitions of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface, we have experienced substantial growth in the number of our employees, the scope of our product portfolio and pipeline, the size of our operating and financial systems, and the geographic area of our operations. Our operations have expanded significantly through these acquisitions. This growth has resulted in increased responsibilities for our management. To manage our growth effectively, we must continue to expand our management team, attract, motivate and retain employees, and improve our operating and financial systems. There can be no assurance that our current management systems will be adequate or that we will be able to manage our recent or future growth successfully. Any failure to do so could have a material adverse effect on our business, operating results and financial condition. 19 We expect to continue to actively explore acquisitions as a part of our future growth strategy, which exposes us to a variety of risks that could adversely affect our business operations. Our business and future growth strategy includes as an important comp1nt the acquisition of businesses, technologies, services, or products that we believe are a strategic fit with or otherwise provide value to our business. We may fund these acquisitions by utilizing our cash, incurring debt, issuing additional shares of our common stock, or by other means. Completed acquisitions may expose us to a number of risks and expenses, including unanticipated liabilities, amortization expenses related to intangible assets with definite lives, or risks associated with entering new markets with which we have limited experience or where commercial alliances with experienced partners or existing sales channels are not available. Whether or not completed, acquisitions may result in diversion of management resources otherwise available for ongoing development of our business and significant expenditures. The acquisitions we have made or may make in the future may make us the subject of lawsuits from either an acquired company stockholders, an acquired company previous stockholders, or our current stockholders. We may be the subject of lawsuits from either an acquired company stockholders, an acquired company previous stockholders, or our current stockholders. These lawsuits could result from the actions of the acquisition target prior to the date of the acquisition, from the acquisition transaction itself, or from actions after the acquisition. Defending potential lawsuits could cost us significant expense and distract management attention from the operation of the business. Additionally, these lawsuits could result in the cancellation of, or the inability to renew, certain insurance coverage that would be necessary to protect our assets. Customer and employee uncertainty about the effects of any acquisitions could harm us. Customers of any companies we acquire may, in response to the consummation of the acquisitions, delay or defer purchasing decisions, which could adversely affect the success of our acquired businesses. Similarly, employees of acquired companies may experience uncertainty about their future roles, which may adversely affect our ability to attract and retain key management, sales, marketing, and technical personnel following an acquisition. Attractive acquisition opportunities may not be available to us. We routinely consider the acquisition of other businesses or assets. However, we may not locate suitable acquisition targets or have the opportunity to make acquisitions of such targets on favorable terms, which could negatively impact the growth of our business. In order to pursue such opportunities, we may require significant additional financing, which may not be available to us on favorable terms, if at all. Our current or potential competitors, many of which have significantly greater resources than we do, may compete with us to acquire compatible businesses, which would increase the acquisition prices and could cause us to expend significant time and funds on acquisitions we are unable to complete. We may require capital in the future. We cannot give any assurance that such capital will be available at all or on terms acceptable to us, and if it is available, additional capital raised by us could dilute your ownership interest or the value of your shares. We may need to raise capital in the future depending on numerous factors, including Market acceptance of our existing and future products; The success and sales of our products under various distributor agreements and other appropriate commercial strategies, including the ability of our partners to achieve third party reimbursement for our products; The successful commercialization of products in development through appropriate commercial models and marketing channels; Progress in our product development efforts; The magnitude and scope of such product development efforts; Any potential acquisitions of products, technologies, or businesses; 20 Progress with preclinical studies, clinical trials, and product approvals and clearances by the FDA and other agencies; The cost and timing of our efforts to manage our manufacturing capabilities and related costs; The cost of filing, prosecuting, defending, and enforcing patent claims and other intellectual property rights and the cost of defending any other legal proceeding; Competing technological and market developments; The development of strategic alliances for the marketing of certain of our products; The terms of such strategic alliances, including provisions (and our ability to satisfy such provisions) that provide upfront and or milest1 payments to us; The cost of maintaining adequate inventory levels to meet current and future product demand; and Further expanding our business in international markets. To the extent funds generated from our operations, together with our existing capital resources, are insufficient to meet future requirements, we will be required to obtain additional funds through equity or debt financings, through strategic alliances with corporate partners and others, or through other sources. The terms of any future equity financings may be dilutive to our investors and the terms of any debt financings may contain restrictive covenants, which limit our ability to pursue certain courses of action. Our ability to obtain financing is dependent on the status of our future business prospects as well as conditions prevailing in the relevant capital markets at the time we seek financing. No assurance can be given that any additional financing will be made available to us or will be available on acceptable terms should such a need arise. If we succeed in raising additional funds through the issuance of equity or convertible securities, then the issuance could result in substantial dilution to existing stockholders. Furthermore, the holders of these new securities or debt may have rights, preferences and privileges senior to those of the holders of common stock. In addition, any preferred equity issuance or debt financing that we may obtain in the future could have restrictive covenants relating to our capital raising activities and other financial and operational matters, which may make it more difficult for us to obtain additional capital and to pursue business opportunities, including potential acquisitions. Our global operations, particularly in Italy, may be adversely affected by the coronavirus outbreak and face risks that could impact our business. A novel strain of coronavirus, COVID 19, originated in Wuhan, China, in December 2019. The virus has spread to Italy, which as of March 2020 reportedly had the highest number of coronavirus infections outside Asia. Though it represents a relatively small percentage of our consolidated business, we conduct commercial activity, product development, sales and inventory management and other services in our Padova, Italy location, and those business operations are subject to potential business interruptions arising from protective measures that may be taken by the Italian government or other agencies or governing bodies. Business disruptions elsewhere in the world could also negatively affect the sources and availability of comp1nts and materials that are essential to the operation of our business in both Italy and the United States. Extended periods of interruption to our Italian or U.S. operations due to the coronavirus outbreak could adversely impact the growth of our business, could cause us to cease or delay operations, and could prevent our customers from receiving shipments or processing payments. The extent to which the coronavirus impacts our global business, sales and results of operations will depend on future developments, which are highly uncertain and cannot be predicted. This includes new information that may emerge concerning the severity of the coronavirus, the spread and proliferation of the coronavirus around the world, and the actions taken to contain the coronavirus or treat its impact, among others. 21 Our manufacturing processes involve inherent risks, and disruption could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The operation of biomedical manufacturing plants involves many risks, including the risks of breakdown, failure, or substandard performance of equipment, the need to comply with the requirements of directives of government agencies, including the FDA, and the occurrence of natural and other disasters. Such occurrences could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations during the period of such operational difficulties and beyond. We rely on a small number of suppliers for certain key raw materials and a small number of suppliers for a number of other materials required for the manufacturing and delivery of our products, and disruption could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Although we believe that alternative sources for many of these and other comp1nts and raw materials that we use in our manufacturing processes are available, we cannot be certain that the supply of key raw materials will continue to be available at current levels or will be sufficient to meet our future needs. For the manufacture of the surgical joint implant and instrumentation products produced by our subsidiary Arthrosurface, we engage a single third party organization as a contract manufacturer. Any supply interruption could harm our ability to manufacture our products until a new source of supply is identified and qualified. We may not be able to find sufficient alternative suppliers in a reasonable time period, or on commercially reasonable terms, if at all, and our ability to produce and supply our products could be impaired. We use raw materials derived from animal sources to produce certain of our products, and there is no guarantee that we will be able to continue to utilize this source of material in the future. Our manufacturing processes and research and development efforts for some of our ophthalmic and veterinary products involve products derived from animals. We procure our animal derived raw materials from a qualified vendor, who controls for contamination and has processes that effectively inactivate infectious agents; however, we cannot assure you that we can completely eliminate the risk of transmission of infectious agents. Furthermore, regulatory authorities could in the future impose restrictions on the use of animal derived raw materials that could impact our business. The utilization of animals in research and development and product commercialization is subject to increasing focus by animal rights activists. The activities of animal rights groups and other organizations that have protested animal based research and development programs or boycotted the products resulting from such programs could cause an interruption in our manufacturing processes and research and development efforts. The occurrence of material operational problems, including but not limited to the events described above, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations during the period of such operational difficulties and beyond. We lease properties in the United States and Italy, and there is no guarantee that these leaseholds will be without issue or sufficient to support future growth. We lease approximately 134,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and manufacturing space in Bedford, Massachusetts, approximately 10,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and warehouse facility in Franklin, Massachusetts, approximately 40,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and manufacturing space in Sarasota, Florida, and approximately 33,000 square feet of office, research and development, training, and warehousing space in Padova, Italy. The current term of the Bedford lease extends to 2022, and the current term of the Padova lease extends to 2032, each with several options for renewal. Please see Item 2 Properties for additional information on our current leases. The nature of these leaseholds presents certain risks. We must maintain a positive working relationship with the respective owners as a dispute with either owner over payment, maintenance, or any other matter could be disruptive to our business. Additionally, there is a possibility that changes to our business or the geographic location of the facilities could make either location less suitable to our operations. Any renegotiation or termination of either lease could result in substantial cost or business interruption to our operations. Additionally, there is no guarantee that our current space will be sufficient to support our future growth or that any future relocation or expansion of our operations would be completed smoothly or in a timely manner due to, among other things, unexpected construction delays or unexpected difficulties related to the achievement of necessary permitting. Any business disruption as a result of any of these factors could have a material impact on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. 22 We may face circumstances in the future that will result in impairment charges, including, but not limited to, goodwill impairment and In Process Research and Development ( IPR&D ) charges. As of December 31, 2019, we had long lived assets, including goodwill and IPR&D, of $96.4 million. If the fair value of any of our long lived assets, including those that we recently acquired in the acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical for which purchase accounting is not yet complete, decreases as a result of an economic slowdown, a downturn in the markets where we sell products and services, a downturn in our financial performance or future outlook or for other reasons, we may be required to record an impairment charge on such assets. We are required to test intangible assets with indefinite life periods for potential impairment annually and on an interim basis if there are indicators of a potential impairment. We also are required to evaluate amortizable intangible assets and fixed assets for impairment if there are indicators of a possible impairment. Impairment charges could have a negative impact on our results of operations and financial position, as well as on the market price of our common stock. We could become subject to product liability claims, which, if successful, could materially adversely affect our business, financial condition, and results of operations. The testing, marketing, and sale of human health care products entail an inherent risk of allegations of product liability, and there can be no assurance that substantial product liability claims will not be asserted against us. Although we have not received any material product liability claims to date and have an insurance policy of $5.0 million per occurrence and $5.0 million in the aggregate to cover such product liability claims should they arise, there can be no assurance that material claims will not arise in the future or that our insurance will be adequate to cover all situations. Moreover, there can be no assurance that such insurance, or additional insurance, if required, will be available in the future or, if available, will be available on commercially reasonable terms. Any product liability claim, if successful, could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Our business is dependent upon hiring and retaining qualified management and technical personnel, including our hiring of a permanent chief executive officer. We are highly dependent on the members of our management and technical staff, the loss of 1 or more of whom could have a material adverse effect on us. We have experienced a number of management changes in recent years, and there can be no assurances that any future management changes will not adversely affect our business. We believe that our future success will depend in large part upon our ability to attract and retain technical and highly skilled executive, managerial, professional, and technical personnel. We face significant competition for such personnel from competitive companies, research and academic institutions, government entities, and other organizations. There can be no assurance that we will be successful in hiring or retaining the personnel we require. The failure to hire and retain such personnel could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. On January 29, 2020, Joseph Darling, our former President and Chief Executive Officer, passed away unexpectedly. Dr. Cheryl Blanchard, a member of the Board of Directors, has been named Interim Chief Executive Officer. The Board of Directors has undertaken a search process to identify and hire a permanent chief executive officer. A failure to hire a highly qualified successor chief executive officer, or an extended delay in the hiring process, could materially limit or restrict our ability to execute our long term strategy and to operate our business. 23 Currency exchange rate fluctuations may have a negative impact on our reported earnings. Approximately 4% of our business during 2019 was conducted in functional currencies other than the U.S. dollar, which is our reporting currency. Thus, currency fluctuations among the U.S. dollar and the other currencies in which we do business have caused and will continue to cause foreign currency transaction gains and losses. Currently, we attempt to manage foreign currency risk through the matching of assets and liabilities. In the future, we may undertake to manage foreign currency risk through additional hedging methods. We recognize foreign currency gains or losses arising from our operations in the period incurred. We cannot guarantee that we will be successful in managing foreign currency risk or in predicting the effects of exchange rate fluctuations upon our future operating results because of the variability of currency exposure and the potential volatility of currency exchange rates. Information security breaches or business system disruptions may adversely affect our business. We rely on our information technology infrastructure and management information systems to effectively run our business. While we have not previously experienced a material information security breach caused by illegal hacking, computer viruses, or acts of vandalism or terrorism, we may in the future be subject to such a breach. Our security measures or those of our third party service providers may not detect or prevent such breaches. Any such compromise to our information security could result in an interruption in our operations, the unauthorized publication of our confidential business or proprietary information, the unauthorized release of customer, vendor, or employee data, the violation of privacy, including under the GDPR recently promulgated in the European Union, or other laws and exposure to litigation, any of which could harm our business and operating results. Risks Related to Our Intellectual Property We may be unable to adequately protect our intellectual property rights, which could have a material impact on our business and future financial results. Our efforts to enforce our intellectual property rights may not be successful. We rely on a combination of copyright, trademark, patent, and trade secret laws, confidentiality procedures, and contractual provisions to protect our proprietary rights. Our success will depend, in part, on our ability to obtain and enforce patents and trademarks, to protect trade secrets, to obtain licenses to technology owned by third parties when necessary, and to conduct our business without infringing on the proprietary rights of others. The patent positions of pharmaceutical, medical product, and biotechnology firms, including ours, can be uncertain and involve complex legal and factual questions. There can be no assurance that any patent applications will result in the issuance of patents or, if any patents are issued, that they will provide significant proprietary protection or commercial advantage or will not be circumvented by others. Filing and prosecution of patent applications, litigation to establish the validity and scope of patents, assertion of patent infringement claims against others, and the defense of patent infringement claims by others can be expensive and time consuming. There can be no assurance that, in the event that any claims with respect to any of our patents, if issued, are challenged by 1 or more third parties, any court or patent authority ruling on such challenge will determine that such patent claims are valid and enforceable. An adverse outcome in such litigation or patent review process could cause us to lose exclusivity covered by the disputed rights. If a third party is found to have rights covering products or processes used by us, we could be forced to cease using the technologies or marketing the products covered by such rights, we could be subject to significant liabilities to such third party, and we could be required to license technologies from such third party in order to continue production of the products. Furthermore, even if our patents are determined to be valid, enforceable, and broad in scope, there can be no assurance that competitors will not be able to design around such patents and compete with us using the resulting alternative technology. We have a policy of seeking patent protection for patentable aspects of our proprietary technology. We intend to seek patent protection with respect to products and processes developed in the course of our activities when we believe such protection is in our best interest and when the cost of seeking such protection is not inordinate. However, no assurance can be given that any patent application will be filed, that any filed applications will result in issued patents, or that any issued patents will provide us with a competitive advantage or will not be successfully challenged by third parties. The protections afforded by patents will depend upon their scope and validity, and others may be able to design around our patents. 24 We also rely upon trade secrets and proprietary know how for certain non patented aspects of our technology. To protect such information, we require all employees, consultants, and licensees to enter into confidentiality agreements limiting the disclosure and use of such information. There can be no assurance that these agreements provide meaningful protection or that they will not be breached, that we would have adequate remedies for any such breach, or that our trade secrets, proprietary know how, and our technological advances will not otherwise become known to others. In addition, there can be no assurance that, despite precautions taken by us, others have not and will not obtain access to our proprietary technology. Further, there can be no assurance that third parties will not independently develop substantially equivalent or better technology. There can be no assurance that we will not infringe upon the intellectual property rights of others, which could have a significant impact on our business and financial results. Other entities have filed patent applications for, or have been issued patents concerning, various aspects of HA related products or processes, including in the segments in which we do business. There can be no assurance that the products or processes developed by us will not infringe on the patent rights of others in the future. The cost of defending infringement suits is typically large, and there is no guarantee that any future defense would be successful. In addition, infringement could lead to substantial damages payouts or our inability to produce or market certain of our current or future products. As a result, any such infringement may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Risks Related to Ownership of Our Common Stock Our stock price may be highly volatile, and we cannot assure you that market making in our common stock will continue. The market price of shares of our common stock may be highly volatile. Factors such as announcements of new commercial products or technological innovations by us or our competitors, disclosure of results of clinical testing or regulatory proceedings, government regulation and approvals, developments in patent or other proprietary rights, public concern as to the safety of products developed by us, and general market conditions may have a significant effect on the market price of our common stock. The trading price of our common stock could be subject to wide fluctuations in response to quarter to quarter variations in our operating results, material announcements by us or our competitors, governmental regulatory action, conditions in the health care industry generally or in the medical products industry specifically, or other events or factors, many of which are beyond our control. In addition, the stock market has experienced extreme price and volume fluctuations, which have particularly affected the market prices of many medical products companies and which often have been unrelated to the operating performance of such companies. Our operating results in future quarters may be below the expectations of equity research analysts and investors. In such an event, the price of our common stock would likely decline, perhaps substantially. If securities or industry analysts do not publish or cease publishing research or reports about us, our business, or our market, or if they adversely change their recommendations regarding our stock, our stock price and trading volume could decline. The trading market for our common stock is influenced by the research and reports that securities or industry analysts may publish about us, our business, our market, or our competitors. No person is under any obligation to publish research or reports on us, and any person publishing research or reports on us may discontinue doing so at any time without notice. If adequate research coverage is not maintained on our company or if any of the analysts who cover us downgrade our stock or publish inaccurate or unfavorable research about our business or provide relatively more favorable recommendations about our competitors, our stock price would likely decline. If any analysts who cover us were to cease coverage of our company or fail to regularly publish reports on us, we could lose visibility in the financial markets, which in turn could cause our stock price or trading volume to decline. 25 Our charter documents contain anti takeover provisions that may prevent or delay an acquisition of our company. Our charter documents continue to contain anti takeover provisions that could prevent or delay an acquisition of our company. The provisions include, among others, a classified board of directors, advance notice to the board of stockholder proposals, limitations on the ability of stockholders to remove directors and to call stockholder meetings, and a provision that allows vacancies on the Board of Directors to be filled by vote of a majority of the remaining directors. We are also subject to Section 203 of the Delaware General Corporate Law which, subject to certain exceptions, prohibits a Delaware corporation from engaging in any of a broad range of business combinations with any interested stockholder for a period of 3 years following the date that such stockholder becomes an interested stockholder. Those provisions could have the effect of discouraging a third party from pursuing a non negotiated takeover of our company at a price considered attractive by many stockholders and could have the effect of preventing or delaying a potential acquirer from acquiring control of our company. ITEM 2 PROPERTIES Our corporate headquarters is located in Bedford, Massachusetts, where we lease approximately 134,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and manufacturing space. We entered into this lease in January 2007, and the lease commenced in May 2007 for an initial term of ten and a half years. In October 2016, we exercised the first option under the lease to extend its term for five years. There are 3 additional renewal periods, each of which is subject to the condition that we notify the landlord of our exercise of such option at least 1 year prior to the expiration of the then current term. 2 additional renewal options each extend the term an additional five years, and the final renewal option extends the term an additional six years. In October 2015, Anika S.r.l. entered into a build to suit lease agreement for a new European headquarters facility consisting of approximately 33,000 square feet of general office, research and development, training, and warehousing space located in Padova, Italy. This lease, which has an initial term of fifteen years, commenced in February 2017 in accordance with the lease agreement, as amended in February 2017. The lease will automatically renew for up to 3 additional six year terms, subject to certain terms and conditions. Anika S.r.l. may elect to early withdraw from this lease subject to certain financial penalties after six years and with no penalties after the ninth year. In the first quarter of 2020 we added approximately 10,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and warehouse facility in Franklin, Massachusetts and approximately 40,000 square feet of administrative, research and development, and manufacturing space in Sarasota, Florida through our respective acquisitions of Arthrosurface, Incorporated and Parcus Medical, LLC. In 2019, we had aggregate facility lease expenses of approximately $19 million. We believe that the capacity of our Bedford, Franklin, Sarasota, and Padova facilities will be sufficient to satisfy our needs for the foreseeable future. ITEM 3 LEGAL PROCEEDINGS We are involved from time to time in various legal proceedings arising in the normal course of business. Although the outcomes of these legal proceedings are inherently difficult to predict, we do not expect the resolution of these proceedings to have a material adverse effect on our financial position, results of operations, or cash flow. 26 I ITEM 5. MARKET FOR REGISTRANT S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES Common Stock Information Our common stock has traded on the NASDAQ Global Select Market since November 25, 1997, under the symbol ANIK. At December 31, 2019, the closing price per share of our common stock was $5185 as reported on the NASDAQ Global Select Market, and there were 116 holders of record. We believe that the number of beneficial owners of our common stock at that date was substantially greater, due to shares being held by intermediaries. We have never declared or paid any cash dividends on our common stock. We currently intend to retain earnings, if any, for use in our business and do not anticipate paying cash dividends on our common stock in the foreseeable future. Payment of future dividends, if any, on our common stock will be at the discretion of our Board of Directors after taking into account various factors, including our financial condition, operating results, anticipated cash needs, and plans for expansion. 27 Performance Graph Set forth below is a graph comparing the total returns of our company, the NASDAQ Composite Index, and the NASDAQ Biotechnology Index. The graph assumes $100 is invested on December 31, 2014 in our common stock and each of the indices. Past performance is not indicative of future results. Dec 14 Dec 15 Dec 16 Dec 17 Dec 18 Dec 19 Anika Therapeutics, Inc. $ 100.00 $ 9367 $ 120.18 $ 13233 $ 8250 $ 127.27 NASDAQ Composite Index $ 100.00 $ 105.73 $ 11366 $ 145.76 $ 140.10 $ 189.45 NASDAQ Biotechnology Index $ 100.00 $ 11142 $ 87.26 $ 105.64 $ 95.79 $ 119.17 Issuer Purchases and Withholding of Equity Securities Under our equity compensation plans, and subject to the specific approval of the Compensation Committee of our Board of Directors, grantees have the option of electing to satisfy tax withholding obligations at the time of vesting or exercise by allowing us to withhold shares of stock otherwise issuable to the grantee. During the 3 month period ended December 31, 2019, we withheld 672 shares to satisfy grantee tax withholding obligations on restricted stock award vesting events. Following is a summary of stock repurchases for the 3 month period ended December 31, 2019 (in thousands, except share data) Period Total Number of Shares Withheld Average Price per Share Total Number of Shares Purchased as Part of Publicly Announced Plans or Programs Maximum Number (or Approximate Dollar Value) of Shares that May Yet be Purchased Under the Plans or Programs(1) October 1 to 31, 2019 672 $ 69.67 $ 32,000 November 1 to 30, 2019 $ 32,000 December 1 to 31, 2019 $ 32,000 Total 672 (1) On May 2, 2019, we announced that our Board of Directors approved a $50.0 million share repurchase program with $30.0 million to be utilized for an accelerated share repurchase program and $20.0 million reserved for open market repurchases. Through December 31, 2019, we have made no open market repurchases. On May 7, 2019, we entered into a previously announced accelerated share repurchase agreement (the ASR Agreement ) to repurchase an aggregate of $30.0 million of common stock. During the second quarter of 2019, 451,694 shares were delivered to us, constituting the initial delivery of shares and representing 60% of the then estimated total number of shares expected to be repurchased under the ASR Agreement. On January 14, 2020, pursuant to the terms of the ASR Agreement, Morgan Stanley accelerated the final settlement date from February 2020, and the final number of shares and the average purchase price was determined. Based on the volume weighted average price from the effective date of the ASR Agreement through January 14, 2020, less the applicable contractual discount, Morgan Stanley delivered 139,057 additional shares to us on January 17, 2020. In total, 590,751 shares were repurchased under the ASR Agreement at an average repurchase price of approximately $50.78. All shares were repurchased in accordance with the publicly announced program. Securities Authorized for Issuance Under Equity Compensation Plans For information regarding securities authorized for issuance under our employee stock based compensation plans, see II, Item 12, Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters, included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. ITEM 6. SELECTED FINANCIAL DATA The following selected consolidated financial data should be read in conjunction with the Consolidated Financial Statements and the Notes thereto and the section capti1d Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. The Balance Sheet Data at December 31, 2019 and 2018 and the Statement of Operations Data for each of the 3 years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 have been derived from the audited Consolidated Financial Statements for such years, included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. The Balance Sheet Data at December 31, 2017, 2016, and 2015, and the Statement of Operations Data for each of the 2 years in the period ended December 31, 2016 and 2015 have been derived from audited consolidated financial statements for such years not included in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. 28 ITEM 7. MANAGEMENT S DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OF FINANCIAL CONDITION AND RESULTS OF OPERATIONS Years ended December 31, 2019 2018 2017 2016 2015 Statements of Operations Data (in thousands, except per share data) Product revenue $ 114,512 $ 105,531 $ 107,783 $ 102,932 $ 87,696 Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue 98 24 5,637 447 5,303 Total revenue 114,610 105,555 113,420 103,379 92,999 Cost of product revenue 28,747 31,280 27,364 24,027 21,053 Product gross profit 85,765 74,251 80,419 78,905 66,643 Product gross margin 75 % 70 % 75 % 77 % 76 % Total operating expenses 80,362 83,806 67,691 52,772 44,865 Net income 27,193 18,722 31,816 32,547 30,758 Diluted net income per common share $ 189 $ 127 $ 211 $ 215 $ 201 Diluted common shares outstanding 14,374 14,689 15,068 15,116 15,321 Years ended December 31, 2019 2018 2017 2016 2015 Balance Sheet Data (in thousands) Cash, cash equivalents and investments $ 184,943 $ 159,014 $ 157,256 $ 124,761 $ 138,458 Working capital 218,029 191,654 193,254 161,641 159,155 Total assets 330,710 278,993 282,617 240,246 235,748 Long term liabilities 26,055 4,092 6,054 8,674 7,622 Retained earnings 245,426 218,233 199,511 168,209 135,662 Stockholders' equity 288,378 263,612 263,491 222,773 210,848 Effective January 1, 2018 we adopted the guidance in the FASB Accounting Standards Codification ( ASC ) Revenue from Contracts with Customers (ASC 606) using the modified retrospective method. Revenues for all periods prior to January 1, 2018 were recognized under ASC 605, Revenue Recognition . Effective January 1, 2019 the we adopted the guidance in the FASB ASC Leases (ASC 842) using the modified retrospective method. Lease accounting for all periods prior to January 1, 2019 were recognized under ASC 840, Leases . The following section contains statements that are not statements of historical fact and are forward looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. These statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties, and other factors that may cause our actual results, performance, or achievement to differ materially from anticipated results, performance, or achievement, expressed or implied in such forward looking statements. These statements reflect our current views with respect to future events, are based on assumptions, and are subject to risks and uncertainties. We discuss many of these risks and uncertainties at the beginning of this Annual Report on Form 10 K and under the sections capti1d Business and Risk Factors. The following discussion should also be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and the Notes thereto appearing elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Management Overview Founded in 1992, Anika Therapeutics, Inc. is a global, integrated joint preservation and regenerative therapies company based in Bedford, Massachusetts. Our mission is to be the global leader in orthopedic joint therapies and sports medicine with innovative technologies that exceed our customers expectations. We are committed to delivering solutions to improve the lives of patients across a continuum of care from joint pain management and regenerative therapies to sports medicine and orthopedic joint preservation and restoration. We have nearly thirty years of global expertise commercializing more than twenty products based on our hyaluronic acid, or HA, technology platform, and we are focused on adding innovative and differentiated offerings to our consolidated portfolio. Our proprietary technologies for modifying the HA molecule allow product properties to be tailored specifically to multiple therapeutic uses. Certain of our technology chemically modifies HA to allow for longer residence time in the body. We have 2 forms of cross linked HA gel technologies, and a solid form of HA technology HYAFF which is the platform for our regenerative medicine. These proprietary technologies are protected by an extensive portfolio of owned and licensed patents. As we look towards the future, our business is uniquely positi1d to capture value within the sports and regenerative medicine market. Our success is driven by our focus on our talent and culture, investment in innovative research and development programs to feed our product pipeline, expanding our commercial footprint domestically and internationally, and pursuing strategic inorganic growth opportunities. We intend to continue to accelerate our commercial capabilities as we transform into a customer centric company dedicated to advancing the joint preservation and restoration continuum of care. We believe that this commitment, along with our financial resources and operating history, have positi1d us well to deliver sustained value to our shareholders. 29 In early 2020, we expanded our overall technology platform through our strategic acquisitions of Parcus Medical, LLC, or Parcus Medical, a sports medicine implant and instrumentation solutions provider focused on surgical repair and reconstruction of ligaments and tendons, and Arthrosurface, Incorporated, or Arthrosurface, a joint preservation technology company specializing in less invasive, b1 preserving partial and total joint replacement solutions. The Company expects the Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface acquisitions to drive growth by Broadening Anika's product portfolio further into the sports medicine joint preservation and restoration space; Adding high growth revenue streams; Expanding our commercial capabilities; Diversifying our revenue base; and Expanding our product pipeline and research and development expertise. In addition, we believe that our historical HA and regenerative medicine expertise will be highly complementary to the sports medicine implants and instrumentation expertise of Parcus Medical and the partial and total joint replacement expertise of Arthrosurface. We believe that the combination of these 3 businesses positions Anika to provide innovative solutions along the orthopedic continuum of care and build significant value for patients, physicians, and key healthcare system stakeholders. Key Developments On January 4, 2020, we signed agreements to acquire Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface. The Parcus Medical transaction closed on January 24, 2020. Under the terms of the Parcus Medical agreement, Anika acquired all outstanding membership interests of Parcus Medical in exchange for an upfront payment of approximately $35.0 million in cash from our then existing balance sheet. In addition, Parcus Medical unitholders will be eligible to receive an additional $60.0 million contingent upon the achievement of certain commercial milest1s. The Arthrosurface transaction closed on February 3, 2020. Under the terms of the Arthrosurface agreement, Anika acquired all outstanding shares of Arthrosurface in exchange for an upfront payment of approximately $60.0 million in cash from our then existing balance sheet. In addition, Arthrosurface shareholders will be eligible to receive an additional $40.0 million contingent upon achievement of certain regulatory and commercial milest1s. On January 29, 2020, we announced that our board of directors had appointed an Office of the President, comprised of 3 of our executive officers, to provide ongoing leadership and oversight of day to day operations following the unexpected death of Joseph Darling, our former President and Chief Executive Officer, earlier on that date. On February 12, 2020, we announced that the board appointed Dr. Cheryl R. Blanchard, 1 of our directors, to serve as our Interim Chief Executive Officer, in lieu of the continuation of the Office of the President, effective February 10, 2020. The previously appointed Office of the President was dissolved as of that date. Products Historically, we have categorized our product offerings into four segments Orthobiologics, Dermal, Surgical, and Other, which included our ophthalmic and veterinary products. Moving forward, we will divide our product portfolio into 3 categories Joint Pain Management Therapy, Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care, and Other. The table below demonstrates the categorization of key products based on the products commercialized as of December 31, 2019 Prior Product Categorization Product Family Subcategories Key Products Viscosupplements ORTHOVISC MONOVISC Orthobiologics CINGAL B1 repair TACTOSET Dermal Dermal filler ELEVESS Surgical Surgical anti adhesion HYALOBARRIER MEROGEL Other Veterinary HYVISC Ophthalmic 30 The table below demonstrates the recategorization of key products based on the current product portfolio being commercialized, including those from the recent acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical. New Product Categorization Product Family Subcategories Key Products Human Viscosupplements ORTHOVISC Joint Pain Management MONOVISC Therapy CINGAL Veterinary Viscosupplements HYVISC Joint implant and instrumentation devices, and partial and total joint replacement solutions Orthopedic Joint Preservation B1 repair therapy TACTOSET and Restoration Care Regenerative and orthopedic surgical therapies HYALOFAST Advanced Wound Care HYALOMATRIX HYALOFILL Other Dermal filler Surgical anti adhesion HYALOBARRIER MEROGEL Ophthalmic ANIKAVISC Through the acquisition of Parcus Medical, we added a line of implant and instrumentation products used by surgeons to repair and reconstruct damaged ligaments and tendons due to sports injuries, trauma and disease. These solutions include screws, sutures, anchors, and other surgical systems that facilitate surgical procedures on the shoulder, knee, hip, distal extremities, and tissue. Through the acquisition of Arthrosurface, we added a portfolio of partial and total joint surface and preservation solutions including a catalogue of over 150 different surface implant curvatures for the knee, shoulder, hip, ankle, wrist and toe that are designed to treat upper and lower extremity orthopedic conditions caused by trauma, injury and arthritic disease. Moving forward, these products will be included in the Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care category. The following sections provide more information about our products Joint Pain Management Therapies Our Joint Pain Management Therapies product family consists of injectable viscosupplement products that provide pain relief from osteoarthritis conditions. These products include MONOVISC, ORTHOVISC, CINGAL, and HYVISC, HA based intraarticular injectable products indicated for the treatment of osteoarthritis pain. Our Joint Pain Management Therapy products are administered to patients in an office setting. We distribute the products in this category using a distributor model, as more fully described in the section titled Sales Channel. In the United States, MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC are marketed by DePuy Synthes Mitek Sports Medicine, a division of DePuy Orthopaedics, Inc., or Mitek, under the terms of a pair of licensing, distribution, supply, and marketing agreements, or the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and Mitek ORTHOVISC Agreement. In the United States, MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC have maintained the combined overall viscosupplement market leadership position since the first quarter of 2018 on a revenue generation basis. Internationally, we market our Joint Pain Management Therapy products using a growing ne2rk of commercial distributors in Canada, Europe, the Middle East, Latin America, and Asia. 31 HYVISC is a high molecular weight injectable HA product for the treatment of joint dysfunction in horses due to non infectious synovitis associated with equine osteoarthritis. HYVISC is distributed by Boehringer Ingelheim Vetmedica, Inc., Boehringer, in the United States. Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care Our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care family consists of the following key products Several orthopedic regenerative medicine products based on our proprietary HYAFF technology, which is a solid form of HA. They include HYALOFAST, a biodegradable support for human b1 marrow mesenchymal stem cells used for cartilage regeneration and as an adjunct for microfracture surgery. These products are currently available in Europe, South America, Asia, and certain other international markets. TACTOSET, an HA enhanced b1 repair therapy designed to treat insufficiency fractures. TACTOSET is available in the United States, and we expect to leverage the commercial infrastructure of our recent acquisitions to increase market access to sell TACTOSET. Arthrosurface catalogue of over 150 partial and total joint surface implants and preservation solutions for the knee, shoulder, hip, ankle, wrist and toe that are designed to treat upper and lower extremity orthopedic conditions caused by trauma, injury and arthritic disease. These products are designed to be less invasive and more b1 preserving than conventional joint replacements. These products are available in the United States and over 25 international markets. Parcus Medical line of surgical implant and instrumentation solutions that are used by surgeons to repair and reconstruct damaged ligaments and tendons due to sports injuries, trauma and disease. These solutions include screws, sutures, anchors, and other surgical systems that facilitate surgical procedures on the shoulder, knee, hip, distal extremities, and tissue. They are typically utilized by surgeons in ambulatory surgical center, or ASC, and hospital environments. These products are commercialized in the United States and over 60 international markets. Other Our Other product family consists of legacy HA based products that do not fit into 1 of our other primary product categories. These products include Advanced wound care products based on our HYAFF technology are used for the treatment of skin wounds, ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers. The products cover a variety of wound treatment solutions, including debridement agents, advanced therapies to aid healing, and scaffolds used as skin substitutes. Leading products include HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL, which are used for the treatment of complex wounds such as burns and ulcers. Products used in connection with the treatment of ENT (ears, nose and throat) disorders. The lead product is MEROGEL, a HYAFF based woven fleece nasal packing. We have partnered with Medtronic XoMed, Inc., Medtronic, for worldwide distribution of these ENT products. 32 Ophthalmic products, including injectable, high molecular weight HA products used as viscoelastic agents in ophthalmic surgical procedures such as cataract extraction and intraocular lens implantation. Sales Channels Since our inception in 1992, we historically utilized a commercial partnership model for the distribution of our products to end users. Our strong, worldwide ne2rk of distributors has historically provided, and continues to provide, a solid foundation for our revenue growth and territorial expansion. In 2019, we implemented a hybrid commercial approach that balances a small direct model with a ne2rk of distributor partners in the U.S. market, and we utilized this hybrid approach for the launch of TACTOSET. The acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical each added to our commercial infrastructure, especially in the United States. Arthrosurface has approximately 35 sales representatives and 100 distributors in the U.S., while Parcus Medical employs a similar, though more mature, model as Anika and has over 50 U.S. distributors in place. For products in our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care family, including those currently in research and development or those not yet developed, we intend to leverage the expanded hybrid direct sales infrastructure of the consolidated entity. This framework pairs an internal direct sales team with external sales agent partners to maximize territorial coverage and sales generation. Generally, products within this family are sold into surgical environments, such as hospitals or ambulatory surgery centers, and we believe that we have a strong infrastructure now in place to service these customers. We intend to cross train the sales staffs to create a consolidated sales structure selling all of the products within our portfolio. We also intend to assess each selling territory to maximize our coverage and reach as many customers and patients as possible. For longer term future products in the U.S. market within our Joint Pain Management Therapies or Other families, we intend to evaluate our commercial model and possible alternatives or augmentations in each instance on a case by case basis, based on market dynamics and other factors. These models could include direct sales, distribution partnerships, or a hybrid of those forms. For current products in the U.S. market, we intend to retain our current distribution relationships, including with Mitek, as they continue to provide meaningful revenue and growth opportunities. Internationally, we expect to maintain our current distribution model for the foreseeable future. Notwithstanding that general expectation, we will evaluate modifications or possible alternatives to that model on a case by case basis based upon market dynamics and resource allocation. We also intend to evaluate and synergize our international distributor base to ensure that we maximize our partnerships and grow revenue from our entire product portfolio. Manufacturing We manufacture the majority of our products ourselves at our facilities in Bedford, Massachusetts, where we make the totality of the products associated with the historic Anika business, and, following our acquisition of Parcus Medical, in Sarasota, Florida, where we make the vast majority of the historic Parcus Medical finished products. For the manufacture of the partial and total joint surface implants and preservation products produced Arthrosurface, we engage a single third party organization as a contract manufacturer. The raw materials necessary to manufacture our products are generally available from multiple sources. However, we rely on a small number of suppliers for certain key raw materials and a small number of suppliers for certain other materials required for the manufacturing and delivery of these products. Research and Development Our research and development efforts primarily consist of the development of new medical applications for our technology platform, the development of intellectual property with respect to our technology platform, the management of clinical trials for certain product candidates, the preparation and processing of applications for regulatory approvals, and process development and scale up manufacturing activities for new and existing products. Our development is focused on orthopedic and regenerative medicine, including products for tissue protection, repair, and regeneration. For the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, research and development expenses were $16.7 million, $18.2 million, and $18.8 million respectively. The decrease in 2019 was mainly due to timing and decision making regarding our clinical activities. We anticipate that we will continue to commit significant resources to, and increase our aggregate spending on, research and development efforts including new product development, preclinical activities and clinical trials in the future. 33 Current research and development activities include clinical trials for CINGAL, a joint pain management therapy composed of our proprietary cross linked HA material combined with an approved steroid, and HYALOFAST, an innovative product for cartilage tissue repair, meant to support eventual regulatory approval for these products in the United States. In pursuing a U.S. regulatory pathway for CINGAL, we have conducted 2 Phase III clinical trials and 2 follow up studies, and the United States Food and Drug Administration, or FDA, has indicated an additional Phase III trial is necessary to support U.S. approval. We are currently working to initiate a pilot study to confirm our trial design, increase our probability of success in a Phase III trial and generate data that ultimately will be needed to support FDA approval. We remain on track to commence the CINGAL pilot study in the first half of 2020. We are also conducting a Phase III trial to support the U.S. regulatory approval of HYALOFAST. We expect to complete patient enrollment in the HYALOFAST study by the end of 2020. In addition, we are working to expand our regenerative medicine pipeline with a new product candidate in the form of an implant for rotator cuff repair utilizing our proprietary solid HA technology, which could be employed to repair partial and full thickness rotator cuff tears. We finalized an initial product prototype, and we are currently performing preclinical testing on the product and developing the surgical instrumentation for the potential product. Summary of Critical Accounting Policies; Significant Judgments and Estimates Our discussion and analysis of our financial condition and results of operations are based upon our consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K, which consolidated financial statements have been prepared in accordance with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States. The preparation of these consolidated financial statements requires us to make estimates and judgments that affect the reported amounts of assets, liabilities, revenues and expenses, and the related disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities. We monitor our estimates on an ongoing basis for changes in facts and circumstances, and material changes in these estimates could occur in the future. Changes in estimates are recorded in the period in which they become known. We base our estimates on historical experience and other assumptions that we believe to be reasonable under the circumstances. Actual results may differ from our estimates if past experience or other assumptions do not turn out to be substantially accurate. We have identified the policies below as critical to our business operations and the understanding of our results of operations. The impact and any associated risks related to these policies on our business operations are discussed throughout this section capti1d Management Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations where such policies affect our reported and expected financial results. For a detailed discussion on the application of these and other accounting policies, see Note 2 to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K. Revenue Recognition General We adopted the guidance in the ASC 606 using the modified retrospective method effective January 1, 2018. The adoption of ASC 606 was applied to all contracts not completed as of the date of adoption. The adoption did not have a material impact on the amount and timing of revenue recognized in the consolidated financial statements. We made no adjustments to our previously reported product and total revenue, as those periods continue to be presented in accordance with our historical accounting practices under Topic 605, Revenue Recognition . Pursuant to ASC 606, we recognize revenue when a customer obtains control of promised goods or services. The amount of revenue that is recorded reflects the consideration that we expect to receive in exchange for those goods or services. We apply the following five step model in order to determine this amount (i) identification of the promised goods or services in the contract; (ii) determination of whether the promised goods or services are performance obligations, including whether they are capable of being distinct or distinct in the context of the contract; (iii) measurement of the transaction price, including the constraint on variable consideration; (iv) allocation of the transaction price to the performance obligations; and (v) recognition of revenue when (or as) we satisfy each performance obligation. 34 We have agreements with Mitek that include the grant of certain licenses, performance of development services, and the supply of product at Mitek option. Revenues from the agreements with Mitek represent 71% of total revenues for the year ended December 31, 2019. We completed the performance obligations related to granted licenses and development services under these agreements prior to 2016. We have no remaining material performance obligations under the Mitek agreements. We have agreements with other customers that may include the delivery of a license and supply of product. The upfront payments under such agreements upon the delivery of the license have not been material. Our typical distributor supply agreements represent a promise to deliver product at the customer discretion that are considered options. We assess if these options provide a material right to the licensee and if so, they are accounted for as separate performance obligations. The majority of our supply agreements do not provide options that are considered material rights. Certain of our agreements include sales based royalties and milest1s. As we consider the license to be the predominant item to which the royalties relate for these agreements, sales based royalties and milest1s are only recognized when the later of the underlying sale occurs or the performance obligation to which some or all of the sales based royalty has been satisfied (or partially satisfied). This is generally in the same period that our licensees complete their product sales in their territory, for which we are contractually entitled to a percentage based royalty. Revenue from sales based royalties is included in product revenues. Product Revenue We sell our products principally to a number of distributors (i.e., our customers) under legally enforceable, executed contracts. Our distributors subsequently resell the products to sub distributors and health care providers, among others. We recognize revenue from product sales when the distributor obtains control of our product, which typically occurs upon shipment to the distributor, in return for agreed upon, fixed price consideration. Performance obligations are generally settled quickly after purchase order acceptance; therefore, the value of unsatisfied performance obligations at the end of any reporting period is generally insignificant. Our payment terms are consistent with prevailing practice in the respective markets in which we do business. Most of our distributors make payments based on fixed price contract terms, which are not affected by contingent events that could impact the transaction price. Payment terms fall within the 1 year guidance for the practical expedient, which allows us to forgo adjustment of the contractual payment amount of consideration for the effects of a significant financing comp1nt. Our contracts with customers do not customarily provide a right of return, unless certain product quality standards are not met. Some of our distributor agreements have volume based discounts with tiered pricing which are generally prospective in nature. These prospective discounts together with any free of charge sample units offered are evaluated as potential material rights. If the prospective discounts or free of charge sample units are considered material rights, these would be separate performance obligations and a portion of the sales transaction price is allocated to the material right. Revenue allocated to the material right is recognized when the additional goods are transferred to the customer or when the option expires. During 2019, the consideration allocated to material rights was not significant. We receive payments from our customers based on billing schedules established in each contract. Up front payments and fees are recorded as deferred revenue upon receipt or when due, and may require deferral of revenue recognition to a future period until we perform our obligations under these arrangements. Amounts are recorded as accounts receivable when our right to consideration is unconditional. Generally, distributor contracts contain Free on Board (FOB) or Ex Works (EXW) shipping point terms where the customer pays the shipping company directly for all shipping and handling costs. In those contracts in which we pay for the shipping and handling, the associated costs are generally recorded along with the product sale at the time of shipment in cost of product revenue when control over the products has transferred to the customer. We do not collect sales tax on product sales as it is not applicable. Value add and other taxes collected by us concurrently with revenue producing activities are excluded from revenue. Our general product warranty does not extend beyond an assurance that the product or services delivered will be consistent with stated contractual specifications, which does not create a separate performance obligation. We recognize the incremental costs of obtaining contracts as an expense when incurred as the amortization period of the assets that we otherwise would have recognized is 1 year or less in accordance with the practical expedient in paragraph ASC 340 40 25 4. These costs are included in selling, general & administrative expenses. 35 Included as a comp1nt of product revenue is sales based royalty revenue, which represents the utilization of our intellectual property licensed by our commercial partners. We record royalty revenues based on estimated net sales of licensed products as reported to us by our commercial partners. Differences between actual and estimated royalty revenues have not been material and are typically adjusted in the following quarter when the actual amounts are known. Under our distribution model, we sell to a diversified base of customers and, therefore, believes there is no material concentration of credit risk. Inventories Inventories are primarily stated at the lower of standard cost and net realizable value, with approximate cost determined using the first in, first out method. Work in process and finished goods inventories include materials, labor, and manufacturing overhead. Inventory costs associated with product candidates that have not yet received regulatory approval are capitalized if we believe there is probable future commercial use and future economic benefit. Our policy is to write down inventory when conditions exist that suggest inventory may be in excess of anticipated demand or is obsolete based upon assumptions about future demand for our products and market conditions. We regularly evaluate the ability to realize the value of inventory based on a combination of factors including, but not limited to, historical usage rates, forecasted sales or usage, product end of life dates, and estimated current or future market values. Purchasing requirements and alternative usage avenues are explored within these processes to mitigate inventory exposure. When recorded, inventory write downs are intended to reduce the carrying value of inventory to its net realizable value. If actual demand for our products deteriorates, or if market conditions are less favorable than those projected, additional inventory write downs may be required. Other long term assets include inventory expected to remain on hand beyond 1 year. Goodwill and Acquired In Process Research and Development Goodwill is the amount by which the purchase price of acquired net assets in a business combination exceeded the fair values of net identifiable assets on the date of acquisition. Acquired In Process Research and Development ( IPR&D ) represents the fair value assigned to research and development assets that we acquire that have not been completed at the date of acquisition or are pending regulatory approval in certain jurisdictions. The value assigned to the acquired IPR&D is determined by estimating the costs to develop the acquired technology into commercially viable products, estimating the resulting revenue from the projects, and discounting the net cash flows to present value. 36 Goodwill and IPR&D are evaluated for impairment annually, or more frequently if events or changes in circumstances indicate that the asset might be impaired. Factors we consider important, on an overall company basis, that could trigger an impairment review include significant underperformance relative to historical or projected future operating results, significant changes in our use of the acquired assets or the strategy for our overall business, significant negative industry or economic trends, a significant decline in our stock price for a sustained period, or a reduction of our market capitalization relative to net book value. To conduct impairment tests of goodwill, the fair value of the reporting unit is compared to its carrying value. If the reporting unit carrying value exceeds its fair value, we record an impairment loss to the extent that the carrying value of goodwill exceeds its implied fair value. Our annual assessment for impairment of goodwill as of November 30, 2019 indicated that the fair value of our reporting unit exceeded the carrying value of the reporting unit. To conduct impairment tests of IPR&D, the fair value of the IPR&D project is compared to its carrying value. If the carrying value exceeds its fair value, we record an impairment loss to the extent that the carrying value of the IPR&D project exceeds its fair value. We estimate the fair value for IPR&D projects using discounted cash flow valuation models, which require the use of significant estimates and assumptions, including, but not limited to, estimating the timing of and expected costs to complete the in process projects, projecting regulatory approvals, estimating future cash flows from product sales resulting from completed projects and in process projects, and developing appropriate discount rates. Our annual assessment for impairment of IPR&D indicated that the fair value of our other IPR&D assets as of November 30, 2019 exceeded their respective carrying values. Through December 31, 2019, there have not been any events or changes in circumstances that indicate that the carrying value of goodwill or acquired intangible assets may not be recoverable. We continue to monitor and evaluate the financial performance of our business, including the impact of general economic conditions, to assess the potential for the fair value of the reporting unit to decline below its book value. There can be no assurance that, at the time future impairment tests are completed, a material impairment charge will not be recorded. Stock Based Compensation We measure the compensation cost of award recipients services received in exchange for an award of equity instruments based on the grant date fair value of the underlying award. That cost is recognized over the period during which an employee is required to provide service in exchange for the award. For performance based options with financial and business milest1 achievement targets, we recognize expense using the graded vesting methodology over the service period. For performance restricted stock units with financial and business milest1 achievement targets, we recognize expense based on the grant date price of our shares with corresponding compensation cost recognized over the requisite service period. For all performance based equity awards, compensation cost is based on the probable outcome of the performance conditions. Changes to the probability assessment and the estimated shares expected to vest will result in adjustments to the related stock based compensation expense that will be recorded in the period of the change. If the performance targets are not achieved, no compensation cost is recognized, and any previously recognized compensation cost is reversed. See Note 13, Equity Incentive Plan , to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for a description of the types of stock based awards granted, the compensation expense related to such awards, and detail of equity based awards outstanding. See Note 16, Income Taxes , to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for details related to the tax benefit recognized in the consolidated statement of operations for stock based compensation. 37 Results of Operations Year ended December 31, 2019 compared to year ended December 31, 2018 Statement of Operations Detail Years Ended December 31, 2019 2018 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) (in thousands, except percentages) Product revenue $ 114,512 $ 105,531 $ 8,981 9 % Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue 98 24 74 308 % Total revenue 114,610 105,555 9,055 9 % Operating expenses Cost of product revenue 28,747 31,280 (2,533 ) (8 %) Research & development 16,665 18,190 (1,525 ) (8 %) Selling, general & administrative 34,950 34,336 614 2 % Total operating expenses 80,362 83,806 (3,444 ) (4 %) Income from operations 34,248 21,749 12,499 57 % Interest income, net 1,873 1,458 415 28 % Income before income taxes 36,121 23,207 12,914 56 % Provision for income taxes 8,928 4,485 4,443 99 % Net income $ 27,193 $ 18,722 $ 8,471 45 % Product gross profit $ 85,765 $ 74,251 $ 11,514 16 % Product gross margin 75 % 70 % Total revenue Total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2019 increased by $9.1 million, as compared to the prior year, to $114.6 million. This increase was primarily due to increase in global viscosupplement revenue and the recovery from the 2018 voluntary recall of certain production lots of certain of our HYAFF based products previously described. Product revenue Product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $114.5 million, an increase of $9.0 million, or 9%, compared to prior year. This increase was primarily due to increase in global viscosupplement revenue and the recovery from the 2018 voluntary recall of certain production lots of certain of our HYAFF based products previously described. The following table presents comparative product revenue analysis by product franchise Years Ended December 31, 2019 2018 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) Joint Pain Management Therapy $ 103,466 $ 96,719 $ 6,747 7 % Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care 2,070 1,127 943 84 % Other 8,976 7,685 1,291 17 % $ 114,512 $ 105,531 $ 8,981 9 % 38 Comparative Note Regarding Product Revenue As reflected in the preceding table, we now divide our product portfolio into 3 categories Joint Pain Management Therapy, Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care, and Other. See Management Overview Products. We previously categorized our product offerings into four segments Orthobiologics, Dermal, Surgical, and Other, which included our ophthalmic and veterinary products. In the following table, we present product revenue for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 based on our prior product categorization. We are presenting this information in this report for comparative purposes, because we believe the information may help investors understand and evaluate the effects of our newly revised product categorization. The information is intended only to assist investors in connection with the change in presentation, and our future periodic reports will not include product revenue on the basis of the prior categorization. Years Ended December 31, 2019 2018 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) Orthobiologics $ 101,002 $ 93,556 $ 7,446 8 % Surgical 5,183 5,514 (331 ) (6 %) Dermal 2,244 396 1,848 467 % Other 6,083 6,065 18 0 % $ 114,512 $ 105,531 $ 8,981 9 % Joint Pain Management Therapy Our Joint Pain Management Therapy category consists of our injectable viscosupplement products. Overall, revenue from our Joint Pain Management Therapy franchise increased by $6.7 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 is primarily driven by increased revenue from MONOVISC domestically and internationally, as well as increased revenue from CINGAL in international markets. We expect the Joint Pain Management Therapy product revenue in 2020 to increase as compared to 2019, primarily due to domestic MONOVISC and international CINGAL revenue. Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care Our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care products consist of regenerative products based on our proprietary HYAFF technology which is a solid form of HA; TACTOSET, an HA enhanced b1 repair therapy designed to treat insufficiency fractures; and starting in 2020, a line of surgical implant and instrumentation solutions; and a catalogue of joint surface implants and preservation solutions for shoulder, wrist, hip, ankle, and toe joints. Overall, revenue from our Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care franchise increased by $0.9 million in 2019 as compared to 2018 primarily due to recovery from the previously discussed 2018 voluntary product recall and the U.S. commercial launch of TACTOSET, formally launched in the U.S. in December 2019. We expect a significant increase in the Orthopedic Joint Preservation and Restoration Care franchise in 2020, as a result of the acquisitions of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface along with the increased sales of TACTOSET through our hybrid commercial model. Other Our other products include advanced wound care products, based on the HYAFF technology, an aesthetic dermal filler, based on our proprietary chemically modified, cross linked HA technology, products used in connection with the treatment of ENT disorders, a post surgical anti adhesion product, and our ophthalmic and veterinary products. Overall, revenue from our other franchise increased by $13 million primarily due to our previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based dermal products. We expect our other franchise to remain flat in 2020 to be in line with 2019. 39 Product gross profit and margin Product gross profit for the year ended December 31, 2019 was $85.8 million, or 75% of product revenue, as compared with $74.3 million, or 70% of product revenue, for the year ended December 31, 2018. The increase in product gross margin for the year ended December 31, 2019 was primarily driven by more favorable changes in revenue mix, including an increase in domestic royalty revenue from the viscosupplement business and the recovery from the 2018 voluntary product recall previously described. Research and development Research and development expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019 decreased by $15 million, or 8%, as compared to the prior year, primarily due to a decrease in clinical trial expenses related to the CINGAL phase III clinical trials partially offset by higher pre clinical product development activities associated with the development of product candidates in our research and development pipeline, including our rotator cuff therapy. Research and development expense as a percentage of total revenue was 15% in 2019 compared to 17% in 2018. Research and development expenses are expected to increase in 2020 as we further develop new products and clinical trial activities, including preparation for the CINGAL pilot study, expanded patient enrollment in the HYALOFAST Phase III study, continued product development activities including the rotator cuff repair therapy, and performance of required post market clinical follow ups for our MONOVISC and ORTHOVISC T products in the European Union related to the European Union Medical Device Regulation. Selling, general and administrative Selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2019 increased by $0.6 million, or 2%, as compared to 2018. The increase was primarily due to costs related to the acquisitions of Parcus Medical and Arthrosurface, which totaled $29 million in 2019, the U.S. hybrid commercial model, and the launch of TACTOSET, as well as increased personnel related costs and external professional fees. We expect selling, general and administrative expenses for 2020 to increase from 2019 as a result of the continued TACTOSET U.S. commercialization and the expanded commercial infrastructure through the acquisitions of Arthrosurface and Parcus Medical. Income taxes Provisions for income taxes were $8.9 million and $4.5 million for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The increase in the effective tax rate in 2019 of 5.4%, as compared to 2018, is primarily due to a windfall tax benefit in 2018 related to exercises of employee equity awards resulting in an income tax benefit of $15 million compared to an insignificant amount in 2019. 40 As of December 31, 2019, we had gross net operating loss ( NOL ) carry forwards for income tax purposes in Italy of $7.5 million with no expiration date. In connection with the preparation of the financial statements, we performed an analysis to ascertain if it was more likely than not that we would be able to utilize, in future periods, the net deferred tax assets associated with our NOL carry forward. We have concluded that the positive evidence outweighs the negative evidence and, thus, that the deferred tax assets are realizable on a more likely than not basis. As such, we have not recorded a valuation allowance at December 31, 2019 or 2018. In the normal course of business, Anika and its subsidiaries may be periodically examined by various taxing authorities. We file income tax returns in the U.S. federal jurisdiction, in certain U.S. states, and in Italy. The associated tax filings remain subject to examination by applicable tax authorities for a certain length of time following the tax year to which those filings relate. The 2016 through 2018 tax years remain subject to examination by the IRS and other taxing authorities for U.S. federal and state tax purposes. The 2013 through 2018 tax years remain subject to examination by the appropriate governmental authorities for Italy. Net income For the year ended December 31, 2019, net income was $27.2 million, or $189 per diluted share, compared to $18.7 million, or $127 per diluted share, for the same period in the prior year. The increase in net income and diluted earnings per share was primarily a result of increased total revenue, increased product gross profit and a decrease in 1 time expenses associated with the retirement of a former CEO and the 2018 voluntary product recall previously described . Non GAAP Financial Measures Adjusted EBITDA We present information below with respect to adjusted EBITDA, which we define as our net income excluding interest and other income, net, income tax benefit (expense), depreciation and amortization, stock based compensation and acquisition related expenses. This financial measure is not based on any standardized methodology prescribed by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States ( GAAP ) and are not necessarily comparable to similarly titled measures presented by other companies. We have presented adjusted EBITDA because it is a key measure used by our management and Board of Directors to understand and evaluate our operating performance and to develop operational goals for managing our business. We believe this financial measure helps identify underlying trends in our business that could otherwise be masked by the effect of the expenses that we exclude. In particular, we believe that the exclusion of the expenses eliminated in calculating adjusted EBITDA can provide a useful measure for period to period comparisons of our core operating performance. Accordingly, we believe that adjusted EBITDA provides useful information to investors and others in understanding and evaluating our operating results, enhancing the overall understanding of our past performance and future prospects, and allowing for greater transparency with respect to key financial metrics used by our management in its financial and operational decision making. 41 Adjusted EBITDA is not prepared in accordance with GAAP, and should not be considered in isolation of, or as an alternative to, measures prepared in accordance with GAAP. There are a number of limitations related to the use of adjusted EBITDA rather than net income (loss), which is the nearest GAAP equivalent. Some of these limitations are adjusted EBITDA excludes depreciation and amortization and, although these are non cash expenses, the assets being depreciated or amortized may have to be replaced in the future, the cash requirements for which are not reflected in adjusted EBITDA; we exclude stock based compensation expense from adjusted EBITDA although (a) it has been, and will continue to be for the foreseeable future, a significant recurring expense for our business and an important part of our compensation strategy and (b) if we did not pay out a portion of our compensation in the form of stock based compensation, the cash salary expense included in operating expenses would be higher, which would affect our cash position; Adjusted EBITDA does not reflect acquisition related expenses to provide a more useful measure for period to period comparisons of our core operating performance; the expenses and other Item that we exclude in our calculation of adjusted EBITDA may differ from the expenses and other Item, if any, that other companies may exclude from adjusted EBITDA when they report their operating results; adjusted EBITDA does not reflect changes in, or cash requirements for, working capital needs; adjusted EBITDA does not reflect provision for (benefit from) income taxes or the cash requirements to pay taxes; and adjusted EBITDA does not reflect historical cash expenditures or future requirements for capital expenditures or contractual commitments. The following is a reconciliation of net income to adjusted EBITDA for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively Years Ended December 31, 2019 2018 Net income $ 27,193 $ 18,722 Interest and other income, net (1,873 ) (1,458 ) Provision for income taxes 8,928 4,485 Depreciation and amortization 5,991 5,910 Stock based compensation 6,087 11,046 Acquisition related expenses 2,859 Adjusted EBITDA $ 49,185 $ 38,705 Adjusted EBITDA in the year ended December 31, 2019 increased $10.5 million as compared with the comparable period in 2018. The increase in adjusted EBITDA for the periods was primarily due to an increase in total revenue, product gross profit and operating income as a result of a more favorable revenue mix. In addition, the product gross margin for the year ended December 31, 2018 was also adversely impacted by the previously described voluntary product recall. 42 Adjusted Net Income and Adjusted EPS We present information below with respect to adjusted net income and adjusted diluted earnings per share ( adjusted EPS ) , which we define as our net income excluding acquisition related expenses on a tax effected basis. Acquisition related expenses are those that the Company would not have incurred except as a direct result of acquisition transactions. Acquisition related expenses consist of investment banking, legal, accounting, and other professional and related expenses and the impact of purchase accounting, including inventory step up, associated with acquisition transactions. In the context of adjusted net income, acquisition related expenses include inventory step up and the amortization of intangible assets recorded as part of purchase accounting for acquisition transactions. The amortized assets contribute to revenue generation, and the amortization of such assets will recur in future periods until such assets are fully amortized. These assets include the estimated fair value of certain identified assets acquired in acquisitions in 2020 and beyond, including in process research and development, developed technology, customer relationships and acquired tradenames. Adjusted EPS is defined by the Company as GAAP EPS excluding acquisition related costs on a tax adjusted per share basis. This financial measure is not based on any standardized methodology prescribed by GAAP and is not necessarily comparable to similarly titled measures presented by other companies. We have presented adjusted net income and adjusted EPS because they are key measures used by our management and board of directors to understand and evaluate our operating performance and to develop operational goals for managing our business. We believe these financial measures help identify underlying trends in our business that could otherwise be masked by the effect of the expenses that we exclude. In particular, we believe that the exclusion of the expenses eliminated in calculating adjusted net income and adjusted EPS can provide useful measures for period to period comparisons of our core operating performance. Accordingly, we believe that adjusted net income and adjusted EPS provide useful information to investors and others in understanding and evaluating our operating results, enhancing the overall understanding of our past performance and future prospects, and allowing for greater transparency with respect to key financial metrics used by our management in its financial and operational decision making. The following is a reconciliation of adjusted net income to net income for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively For the Twelve Months Ended December 31, 2019 2018 Net income $ 27,193 $ 18,722 Acquisition related expenses, tax effected 2,256 Adjusted net income $ 29,449 $ 18,722 The following is a reconciliation of adjusted diluted EPS to diluted EPS for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively (in thousands, expect per share data) For the Twelve Months Ended December 31, 2019 2018 Diluted earnings per share (EPS) $ 189 $ 127 Acquisition related expenses per share, tax effected 0.16 Adjusted diluted EPS $ 205 $ 127 Adjusted net income and adjusted diluted EPS in the year ended December 31, 2019 increased $10.7 million and $0.78 as compared with the comparable period in 2018. The increase for the period was primarily due to an increase in total revenue, product gross profit and operating income as a result of a more favorable revenue mix. In addition, the product gross margin for the year ended December 31, 2018 was also adversely impacted by the previously described voluntary product recall. 43 Year ended December 31, 2018 compared to year ended December 31, 2017 Statement of Operations Detail Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 $ Inc (Dec) %Inc (Dec) (in thousands, except percentages) Product revenue $ 105,531 $ 107,783 $ (2,252 ) (2 %) Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue 24 5,637 (5,613 ) (100 %) Total revenue 105,555 113,420 (7,865 ) (7 %) Operating expenses Cost of product revenue 31,280 27,364 3,916 14 % Research & development 18,190 18,787 (597 ) (3 %) Selling, general & administrative 34,336 21,540 12,796 59 % Total operating expenses 83,806 67,691 16,115 24 % Income from operations 21,749 45,729 (23,980 ) (52 %) Interest income, net 1,458 473 985 208 % Income before income taxes 23,207 46,202 (22,995 ) (50 %) Provision for income taxes 4,485 14,386 (9,901 ) (69 %) Net income $ 18,722 $ 31,816 $ (13,094 ) (41 %) Product gross profit $ 74,251 $ 80,419 $ (6,168 ) (8 %) Product gross margin 70 % 75 % Total revenue Total revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 decreased by $7.9 million, as compared to the prior year, to $105.6 million. This decrease was primarily due to the achievement of a 1 time $5.0 million milest1 in 2017 for reaching a target MONOVISC U.S. end user sales threshold set forth in the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and the absence of an equivalent milest1 payment in 2018, as well as the impact of pricing declines in the U.S. viscosupplement market and the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of certain of our HYAFF based products. Product revenue Product revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $105.6 million, a decrease of $23 million, or 20%, compared to prior year. A moderate decrease in our dermal and orthobiologics product revenue was partially offset by a product revenue increase in our surgical and other franchises. The following table presents comparative product revenue analysis by product franchise Years Ended December 31, 2018 2017 $ Inc (Dec) % Inc (Dec) Orthobiologics $ 93,556 $ 93,816 $ (260 ) (0 %) Dermal 396 2,755 (2,359 ) (86 %) Surgical 5,514 5,262 252 5 % Other 6,065 5,950 115 2 % $ 105,531 $ 107,783 $ (2,252 ) (2 %) Orthobiologics Our orthobiologics franchise consists of our joint health and orthopedic products. Overall, revenue from our orthobiologics franchises decreased by $0.3 million in 2018 as compared to 2017 primarily as a result of the voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products and a decline in worldwide ORTHOVISC revenue offset in part by strong growth in domestic MONOVISC and international CINGAL revenue. 44 Dermal Our dermal franchise consists of advanced wound care products, which are based on our HYAFF technology, and aesthetic dermal fillers. Our advanced wound care products treat complex skin wounds ranging from burns to diabetic ulcers, with HYALOMATRIX and HYALOFILL as the lead products. Dermal revenue had a significant decline in 2018 as compared to 2017 due to the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products. We resolved the matter and resumed shipment of these products in November 2018. Surgical Our surgical franchise consists primarily of our anti adhesion products, HYALOBARRIER and our ENT offerings, of which MEROGEL is the leading product. We are partnered with Medtronic for the worldwide distribution of our ENT products. Revenue from our surgical products increased $0.3 million, or 5%, in 2018 as compared to 2017. The increase of surgical product revenue was primarily due to an increase in sales of our ENT products. Other Other product revenue was derived from sales of our ophthalmic and veterinary products. Other product revenue increased modestly in 2018 as compared to 2017 primarily as a result of increased sales of ophthalmic products. Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue Licensing, milest1 and contract revenue for the year ended December 31, 2018 was insignificant, compared to $5.6 million for 2017. This decrease was primarily due to the achievement of a 1 time $5.0 million milest1 in 2017 for reaching a target MONOVISC U.S. end user sales threshold set forth in the Mitek MONOVISC Agreement and the absence of an equivalent milest1 payment in 2018. Product gross profit and margin Product gross profit for the year ended December 31, 2018 was $74.3 million, or 70% of product revenue, as compared with $80.4 million, or 75% of product revenue, for the year ended December 31, 2017. The decrease in product gross margin for the twelve month period ended December 31, 2018 was primarily caused by an increase in inventory reserves related to certain raw materials, inventory write offs and charges associated with the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of our HYAFF based products, higher production costs, and revenue mix and pricing dynamics. Research and development Research and development expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 decreased by $0.6 million, or 3%, as compared to the prior year, mainly due to a decrease in expenses for our HYALOFAST and CINGAL phase III clinical trials, partially offset by increases in our product development activities, including those related to the development of a product for rotator cuff therapy and pre commercial development of TACTOSET. Research and development expense as a percentage of total revenue was 17% in 2018 and 2017. Selling, general and administrative Selling, general and administrative expenses for the year ended December 31, 2018 increased by $128 million, or 59%, as compared to 2017. The increase was primarily due to non cash stock based compensation expense related to the retirement of our former Chief Executive Officer , Charles H. Sherwood, Ph.D. , non recurring CINGAL U.S. pre launch market research activities, and increased personnel and external professional fees. 45 Income taxes Provisions for income taxes were $4.5 million and $14.4 million for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, respectively. The decrease in the effective tax rate in 2018 of 118%, as compared to 2017, is primarily due to the reduction of the corporate tax rate as a result of the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act of 2017 ( Tax Act ) tax reform legislation. This legislation makes significant changes to the U.S. tax law, including a reduction in the corporate tax rate from 35% to 21% starting in 2018. In addition, the Company realized a windfall tax benefit in 2018 related to exercises of employee equity awards resulting in a discrete period income tax benefit of $15 million compared to $0.4 million in 2017. As of December 31, 2018, we had gross net operating losses ( NOL ) for income tax purposes in Italy of $5.8 million with no expiration date. In connection with the preparation of the financial statements, we performed an analysis to ascertain if it was more likely than not that we would be able to utilize, in future periods, the net deferred tax assets associated with our NOL carry forward. We have concluded that the positive evidence outweighs the negative evidence and, thus, that the deferred tax assets are realizable on a more likely than not basis. As such, we have not recorded a valuation allowance at December 31, 2018 or 2017. Net income For the year ended December 31, 2018, net income was $18.7 million, or $127 per diluted share, compared to $318 million, or $211 per diluted share, for the same period in the prior year. The decrease in net income and diluted earnings per share was primarily a result of decreased total revenue, decreased product gross margin, the impact of the previously described voluntary recall of certain production lots of certain of our HYAFF based products, and 1 time expenses associated with the retirement of a former CEO, Charles H. Sherwood, Ph.D., and the 2018 voluntary product recall previously described. The decreased revenue and increased expenses are offset by a decreased effective federal income tax rate as a result of the 2017 Income Tax Reform Legislation. Concentration of Risk We have historically derived the majority of our revenues from a small number of customers, most of whom resell our products to end users and most of whom are significantly larger companies than us. For the year ended December 31, 2019, five customers accounted for 82% of product revenue, with Mitek al1 accounting for 71% of product revenue. We expect to continue to be dependent on a small number of large customers, especially Mitek, for the majority of our revenues for the foreseeable future. The failure of these customers to purchase our products in the amounts they historically have or in amounts that we expect would seriously harm our business. 46 In addition, if present and future customers terminate their purchasing arrangements with us, significantly reduce or delay their orders, or seek to renegotiate their agreements on terms less favorable to us, our business, financial condition, and results of operations will be adversely affected. If we accept terms less favorable than the terms of the current agreements, such renegotiations may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, and or results of operations. Furthermore, in any future negotiations we may be subject to the perceived or actual leverage that these customers may have given their relative size and importance to us. Any termination, change, reduction, or delay in orders could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. Accordingly, unless and until we diversify and expand our customer base, our future success will significantly depend upon the timing and size of future purchases by our largest customers and the financial and operational success of these customers. The loss of any 1 of our major customers or the delay of significant orders from such customers, even if only temporary, could reduce or delay our recognition of revenues, harm our reputation in the industry, and reduce our ability to accurately predict cash flow, and, as a consequence, it could seriously harm our business, financial condition, and results of operations. See Note 12, Revenue by Product Group, by Significant Customer and by Geographic Location; Geographic Information , to the consolidated financial statements included elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10 K for information regarding significant customers. Liquidity and Capital Resources We require cash to fund our operating expenses and to make capital expenditures. Historically we have generated positive cash flow from operations, which, together with our available cash, investments, and debt, have met our cash requirements. Cash, cash equivalents, and investments totaled $184.9 million and $159.0 million, and working capital totaled $218.0 million and $1917 million, at December 31, 2019 and December 31, 2018, respectively. As of December 31, 2019, we have $50.0 million of available credit under our senior revolving credit facility with Bank of America, N.A., and we were in compliance with the terms of said credit agreement. We believe that we have adequate financial resources to support our business for at least the next twelve months. Cash provided by operating activities was $37.0 million, $34.9 million, and $40.8 million for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. The increase was primarily related to an increase in accrued expenses offset by a decrease in collections of our accounts receivable due to timing of receipts and an increase in payments for income taxes. Cash provided by (used in) investing activities was $39.7 million, ($50.3) million, and ($125) million for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. The change was due to increased maturities in investments and lower capital expenditures as compared to the same period in 2018 and 2017. Cash provided by (used in) financing activities was ($8.1) million, ($28.9) million, and $0.3 million for 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively. For the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 we executed $30.0 million accelerated share repurchase programs each year. The decrease in cash used in financing activities for the year ended December 31, 2019, was primarily the result of an increase in proceeds from the exercise of employee equity awards as compared to the corresponding period in 2018 and 2017, respectively. 47 Contractual Obligations and Other Commercial Commitments The table below summarizes our non cancelable operating leases, purchase commitments, and contractual obligations related to future periods which are not reflected in our consolidated balance sheet at December 31, 2019. Purchase commitments relate primarily to non cancellable inventory commitments and capital expenditures entered in the normal course of business Payments due by period (in thousands) Less than More than Total 1 year 1 3 years 3 5 years 5 years Operating Leases (1) $ 31,293 $ 2,025 $ 4,005 $ 3,889 $ 21,374 Purchase Commitments (2) 8,684 3,926 2,785 1,805 168 Year Ended December 31, 2019 $ 39,977 $ 5,951 $ 6,790 $ 5,694 $ 21,542 (1) Includes a lease we entered into in January 2007, pursuant to which we lease our corporate headquarters facility, which consists of approximately 134,000 square feet of general office, research and development, and manufacturing space located in Bedford, Massachusetts. The lease has an initial term of ten and 1 half years, and commenced in May 2007. In February 2017, we finalized the exercise of its first option under the lease to extend the terms from November 1, 2017 through October 31, 2022, including the determination of a new annual base rent of $15 million which is included in the disclosure above. No other terms of this lease were altered. We have an option under this lease to extend its lease term for up to 3 additional periods subject to the condition that the Company notify the landlord that we are exercising each option at least 1 year prior to the expiration of the original or then current term. The next 2 renewal options each extend the term an additional five years, while the final renewal option extends the term by six years. Includes a lease entered into pursuant to which Anika S.r.l. leases its Italian facility. In October 2015, Anika S.r.l, entered into a build to suit lease agreement for a new European headquarters facility consisting of approximately 33,000 square feet of general office, research and development, training, and warehousing space located in Padova, Italy. This lease has an initial term of fifteen years which commenced in February 2017. The lease will automatically renew for up to 3 additional six year terms, subject to certain terms and conditions. We have the ability to withdraw from this lease subject to certain financial penalties after six years and with no penalties after the ninth year. As such, lease commitments through the ninth year are included in the table above. The lease provides for an initial yearly rent of approximately $0.3 million. See the section capti1d Item 2 Properties
